Establishment and application of real-time quantitative PCR for diagnosing invasive aspergillosis via the blood in hematological patients: targeting a specific sequence of Aspergillus 28S-ITS2.Invasive aspergillosis (IA) is an important cause of morbidity and mortality in immunocompromised individuals. This study was conducted to identify a desirable target DNA sequence for the diagnosis of aspergillosis using real-time quantitative polymerase chain reaction (qPCR).Genomic DNA was extracted from Aspergillus, Candida, and bacteria species, and qPCR was applied to validate a partial ribosomal DNA 28S-ITS2 sequence. Ethylenediaminetetraacetic acid-anticoagulated blood samples were collected from 72 febrile hematological patients, while total DNA was isolated from plasma and whole blood for the Aspergillus qPCR. The results were analyzed using a receiver operating characteristic curve. All cases were evaluated using the revised European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer/Invasive Fungal Infections Cooperative Group and the National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases Mycoses Study Group (EORTC/MSG) diagnostic criteria.Use of qPCR yielded positive results for 15 Aspergillus species but negative results for Candida species, bacterial strains, and human DNA. The limit of detection was one copy per microliter of DNA. Analytical sensitivity and specificity were six copies of DNA and 100%, respectively. The standard curve showed that qPCR was reliable for Aspergillus detection and that significantly more DNA copies were obtained from whole blood than from plasma (P < 0.001). At a cut-off value ≥ 25 copies/μL, the diagnostic sensitivity and specificity for IA using 28S-ITS2 qPCR were 90.9% and 73.4%, respectively.The use of qPCR with whole blood to detect and verify the 28S-ITS2 sequence is a specific and useful way to diagnose IA.Detection of Aspergillus spp. in biological samples by real-time PCR.Recently, the proportion of invasive infections caused by the filamentous fungi of the Aspergillus genus are growing in immunocompromised persons particularly in transplant recipients and neutropenic patients. Unfortunately, laboratory diagnostics of invasive aspergillosis remains extremely difficult, mainly with regard to the sensitivity of the methods and to the correct interpretation of the results in particular.The aim of this work was to design a standard and reproducible Aspergillus DNA detection method and its validation. The second aim was to practically use this method for diagnosis of Aspergillus DNA in various samples in patients.Real-time PCR with two hybridization probes. Amplification and on-line quantification was carried out on a LightCycler 1.5 Instrument.Specificity of the reaction was tested for A. fumigatus, A. flavus, A. niger and A. terreus, and its sensitivity was determined at 5 copies per ml. The reproducibility of the results was comparable to other methods, reported in the literature. Applicability of the real-time PCR was assessed for detection of Aspergillus DNA in 354 various clinical samples taken from 179 patients at risk of invasive aspergillosis over the period of 33 months. Of 354 samples 103 (29.10 %) taken from 65 patients (36.31 %) were evaluated as positive. Over one year, the percentage of positive samples was mostly about 30 % or less per month.Our results demonstrate the high sensitivity, specificity and reproducibility of this technique, and its usefulness for rapid laboratory diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis.Monochrome LightCycler PCR assay for detection and quantification of five common species of Candida and Aspergillus.Invasive fungal pathogens, especially in immunocompromised hosts, can result in life-threatening infections. Current laboratory/radiological methods for fungal identification are time-consuming and lack sensitivity and specificity. A monochrome, multiplex, real-time PCR assay for the identification and quantification of Candida albicans, Candida krusei, Candida tropicalis, Aspergillus flavus and Aspergillus fumigatus is described here. Detection of each of these fungi was specific and demonstrated 100 % concordance with biochemical/culture identification in all 60 isolates tested. Samples from 16 febrile neutropenic patients with haematological malignancies were also analysed and the utility of the assay in clinical samples was reconfirmed without false-negative results. The sensitivity of this assay was 0.1 pg fungal genomic DNA, corresponding to three cells, for C. albicans, C. krusei, C. tropicalis and A. flavus, and 0.01 pg fungal genomic DNA, i.e. less than one cell, for A. fumigatus. The analysis allows a low-cost, simple, rapid and sensitive alternative for clinical identification and quantification of these five common fungal species.Prospective comparison of the diagnostic potential of real-time PCR, double-sandwich enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay for galactomannan, and a (1-->3)-beta-D-glucan test in weekly screening for invasive aspergillosis in patients with hematological disorders.The establishment of an optimal noninvasive method for diagnosing invasive aspergillosis (IA) is needed to improve the management of this life-threatening infection in patients with hematological disorders, and a number of noninvasive tests for IA that target different fungal components, including galactomannan, (1-->3)-beta-d-glucan (BDG), and Aspergillus DNA, have been developed. In this study, we prospectively evaluated the diagnostic potential of three noninvasive tests for IA that were used in a weekly screening strategy: the double-sandwich enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) for galactomannan (Platelia Aspergillus), a real-time PCR assay for Aspergillus DNA (GeniQ-Asper), and an assay for BDG (beta-glucan Wako). We analyzed 149 consecutive treatment episodes in 96 patients with hematological disorders who were at high risk for IA and diagnosed 9 proven IA cases, 2 probable IA cases, and 13 possible invasive fugal infections. In a receiver-operating characteristic (ROC) analysis, the area under the ROC curve was greatest for ELISA, using two consecutive positive results (0.97; P = 0.036 for ELISA versus PCR, P = 0.055 for ELISA versus BDG). Based on the ROC curve, the cutoff for the ELISA could be reduced to an optical density index (O.D.I.) of 0.6. With the use of this cutoff for ELISA and cutoffs for PCR and BDG that give a comparable level of specificity, the sensitivity/specificity/positive predictive value/negative predictive value of the ELISA and the PCR and BDG tests were 1.00/0.93/0.55/1.00, 0.55/0.93/0.40/0.96, and 0.55/0.93/0.40/0.96, respectively. In conclusion, among these weekly screening tests for IA, the double-sandwich ELISA test was the most sensitive at predicting the diagnosis of IA in high-risk patients with hematological disorders, using a reduced cutoff of 0.6 O.D.I.Multicenter comparison of serum and whole-blood specimens for detection of Aspergillus DNA in high-risk hematological patients.Samples from patients at high risk for invasive aspergillosis (IA) were prospectively collected and analyzed for the presence of molecular markers of fungal infection. Serum specimens were screened for galactomannan and Aspergillus DNA, and whole-blood specimens were screened only for Aspergillus DNA. Fungal infections were categorized according to the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer/Invasive Fungal Infections Cooperative Group, National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases Mycoses Study Group (EORTC/MSG) criteria. Forty-seven cases (proven and probable IA) and 31 controls (no evidence of IA) were selected retrospectively for this case-control study, comprising 803 samples, in order to determine the performance of whole-blood PCR, serum PCR, and serum galactomannan testing. Although no single assay was able to detect every case of IA, a combination of different assays provided the best performance. There was no significant difference between the use of whole-blood and serum specimens for PCR-based diagnosis of IA, but there was a trend for whole blood to be more sensitive (85% versus 79%) and to yield an earlier positive result (36 days versus 15 days) than for serum. However, DNA extraction from serum specimens is easier and faster than that from whole-blood specimens, and it allows the same specimen to be used for both galactomannan and PCR assays. In conclusion, the appropriate sample type for DNA extraction should be determined by the local requirements and the technical platforms available at each individual center. A combination of biomarker tests offered the best diagnostic utility for detecting IA.Application of nucleic acid sequence-based amplification for diagnosis of and monitoring the clinical course of invasive aspergillosis in patients with hematologic diseases.We evaluated nucleic acid sequence-based amplification (NASBA) and a galactomannan enzyme immunosorbent assay (GM-EIA) for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) in neutropenic febrile patients and for monitoring of its clinical course and outcome. Blood samples were collected twice per week from 128 patients with hematologic diseases during periods of neutropenic fever after undergoing chemotherapy or hematopoietic stem cell transplantation. A total of 448 blood samples were tested.There were 14 patients with IA (2 patients with proven IA and 12 with probable IA). The median index of the initial NASBA in the IA group was more than 10-fold higher than that in the non-IA group. Galactomannan antigenemia (index, >0.5) was detected with a sensitivity of 86%. In receiver-operator characteristic analysis, the cutoff index of NASBA for the presumptive diagnosis of IA was determined to be 5.0. Combination of these 2 parameters (either a GM-EIA index of >or=0.5 or a NASBA index of >or=5.0) improved the sensitivity of diagnosis to 100%. There was a close relationship between patient outcome and the kinetics of NASBA values: failure of negative conversion during treatment resulted in death in almost all cases.If either GM-EIA or NASBA results suggest IA, the diagnostic yield for IA could be improved, and NASBA could be a useful marker for predicting the clinical course and outcome of treatment.Analysis of performance of a PCR-based assay to detect DNA of Aspergillus fumigatus in whole blood and serum: a comparative study with clinical samples.The performance of a real-time PCR-based assay was retrospectively analyzed (according to European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer/Mycosis Study Group criteria) in the samples of patients with invasive aspergillosis. A total of 711 serial samples (356 whole-blood and 355 serum samples) from 38 adult patients were analyzed. The Aspergillus fumigatus PCR assay results were positive for 89 of 356 (25%) whole-blood samples and 90 of 355 (25.35%) serum samples. Positive PCR results were seen in 29 of 31 (93.5%) patients for which serum was analyzed and in 31 of 33 (93.9%) cases with whole-blood specimens. Both blood and serum samples were available in 26 cases, and significant differences were not observed in this subgroup of cases. The average number of threshold cycles (C(T)) for positive blood samples was 37.6, and the average C(T) for serum was 37.4. The DNA concentration ranged between 2 and 50 fg per μl of sample, with average DNA concentrations of 10.2 and 11.7 fg in positive blood and serum samples, respectively (P > 0.01). The performance of this PCR-based quantitative assay was similar for both serum and blood samples. We recommend serum samples as the most convenient hematological sample to use for Aspergillus DNA quantification when serial determinations are done.Screening for Aspergillus spp. using polymerase chain reaction of whole blood samples from patients with haematological malignancies.Sensitive screening for Aspergillus spp. using polymerase chain reaction (PCR) of whole blood samples in patients with haematological disorders has not been performed to date. In a 2-year study, 121 patients admitted to the University Hospital of Innsbruck for cancer chemotherapy without clinical signs of fungal infection were prospectively screened for Aspergillus spp. In 28 out of 121 (23%) patients, Aspergillus DNAaemia was detected. Of these patients, 16 (57%) were positive only once for Aspergillus DNA, but positivity was never associated with invasive aspergillosis. PCR positive episodes were short and resolved without antifungal treatment. Five patients (18%) had intermittent PCR positive results. Seven (25%) patients presented at least two consecutive positive PCR results; one of these patients developed invasive aspergillosis and another two were strongly suspected as having aspergillosis. Based on the criteria of the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer case definitions, sensitivity and specificity of serial PCR monitoring were 75% and 96%. Positive PCR results became negative shortly after commencement of antifungal treatment, but the changes did not correlate with clinical responsiveness to treatment in three patients. Our results indicate the potential usefulness of PCR for screening for Aspergillus spp. in patients at risk, but without antifungal treatment.Detection of Aspergillus species in blood and bronchoalveolar lavage samples from immunocompromised patients by means of 2-step polymerase chain reaction: clinical results.Bronchoalveolar lavage (BAL) samples from 67 patients who were at high risk for invasive aspergillosis were examined using a recently developed 2-step polymerase chain reaction (PCR) that detects </=10 fg of Aspergillus DNA in blood and BAL samples in vitro. Thirteen of these patients had PCR and diagnostic results positive for Aspergillus infection. Four patients with possible invasive aspergillosis also had positive PCR results, and the remaining 50 had negative PCR results. In addition, 907 blood samples from 218 high-risk patients were screened. Thirty-three patients with positive PCR results had invasive aspergillosis; 148 patients had PCR and diagnostic results that were negative, and 34 patients with positive PCR results had nonconclusive clinical data. Both blood and BAL testing were performed for 45 patients. All 8 patients with proven invasive aspergillosis showed concordance of positive PCR results. Our data suggest that this PCR method has possible clinical value for confirming and improving the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in high-risk patients.Early detection of aspergillus infection after allogeneic stem cell transplantation by polymerase chain reaction screening.Invasive aspergillosis (IA) has become a major cause of mortality in patients after allogeneic stem cell transplantation. To assess the potential of prospective polymerase chain reaction (PCR) screening for early diagnosis of IA, 84 recipients of an allogeneic stem cell transplant were analyzed with the investigators blinded to clinical and microbiologic data. Of 1193 blood samples analyzed, 169 (14.2%) were positive by PCR. In patients with newly diagnosed IA (n=7), PCR positivity preceded the first clinical signs by a median of 2 days (range, 1-23 days) and preceded clinical diagnosis of IA by a median of 9 days (range, 2-34 days). Pretransplantation IA (relative risk [RR], 2.37), acute graft-versus-host disease (RR, 2.75), and corticosteroid treatment (RR, 6.5) were associated with PCR positivity. The PCR assay revealed a sensitivity of 100% (95% confidence interval [CI], 48%-100%) and a specificity of 65% (95% CI, 53%-75%). None of the PCR-negative patients developed IA during the study period. Thus, prospective PCR screening allows for identification of patients at high risk for subsequent onset of IA.Molecular detection of invasive aspergillosis in hematologic malignancies.Aspergillus species are the most frequent causes of invasive mold infections in immunocompromised patients, particularly those who underwent chemotherapy for hematologic malignancies. The aim of this study was to determine the incidence and efficiency of the PCR-enzyme linked immunosorbent assay method (PCR-ELISA) for early detection of Aspergillus species in patients with hematologic malignancies.From 2004 to 2006, 194 patients with hematologic malignancies (who received chemotherapy) were evaluated for invasive aspergillosis (IA) in Shiraz, southern Iran. Ethylenediaminetetraacetic acid anticoagulant whole blood samples were collected prospectively once a week and stored at -20 degrees C until examination. All collected blood samples were assayed for the presence of the bands on ethidium bromide stained gel and for hybridization.The female-to-male ratio was 61:133, the mean age of patients was 33.7 years, and mean of hospitalization period was 21.2 days. PCR-ELISA was positive in 14 (7.2%) patients who exhibited clinical and radiologic signs of IA. The etiologic agents were Aspergillus flavus (11 cases) and Aspergillus fumigatus (three cases). The mean time of positivity of PCR-ELISA in the blood before the appearance of clinical signs was 12.6 days. PCR was found to be the earliest indicator of IA preceding nonspecific clinical and radiologic findings. The sensitivity, specificity, positive, and negative predictive values of PCR-ELISA to detect DNA-specific for Aspergillus species in patients with proven and probable IA were 66%, 96%, 62.5%, and 97%, respectively. In case patients were treated with antifungal drugs, and the treatment was successful, fungal PCR assay became negative after 14 days and if the treatment failed, assay was positive until death.We demonstrated, in the present study, the incidence of IA in leukemic patients and the usefulness of molecular assay for early diagnosis and monitoring of the treatment of IA.Specific detection of Aspergillus species in blood and bronchoalveolar lavage samples of immunocompromised patients by two-step PCR.The increasing incidence of aspergillosis, a life-threatening infection in immunocompromised patients, emphasizes the need to improve the currently limited diagnostic tools. We developed a two-step PCR assay that specifically amplifies a region of the 18S rRNA gene that is highly conserved in Aspergillus species. A number of primers with the least homology to equivalent human or Candida gene sequences were screened for the pairs that gave the highest sensitivity and specificity. No cross-reaction with the wide range of fungal and bacterial pathogens so far tested was observed. This assay allows direct and rapid detection of down to 10 fg of Aspergillus DNA corresponding to 1 to 5 CFU per ml of blood. A total of 315 blood and bronchoalveolar lavage samples from 140 subjects, including 93 patients at risk for invasive fungal disease, were screened. The result was a 100% correlation between positive histology, culture, or high-resolution computed tomography findings and PCR results. The test specificity was 89%. Our data point to the considerable potential clinical value of this simple, specific, rapid, and inexpensive PCR assay for improving the means of early diagnosis of systemic aspergillosis in high-risk patients.Development of a nested qualitative real-time PCR assay to detect Aspergillus species DNA in clinical specimens.We adapted a nested Aspergillus PCR to a nested qualitative real-time format on a Light Cycler system. An evaluation using 134 clinical specimens showed that the real-time PCR assay significantly reduced the time for results to be made available without compromising sensitivity and was less labor-intensive. Its use will aid in the rapid diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis.PCR and other non-culture methods for diagnosis of invasive Candida infections in allogeneic bone marrow and solid organ transplant recipients.In this prospective study 197 serum and 152 urine samples were collected from 40 bone marrow and solid organ transplant recipients with clinically suspected invasive fungal infection before, during and after empirical treatment with lipid formulation of amphotericin B or fluconazole. Serum was analysed by Candida polymerase chain reaction (PCR) and urine by measurement of D/L-arabinitol ratio. One serum from each patient was also tested for concentration of (1-->3)-beta-glucan and two commercial Candida antigens. Invasive fungal infection was diagnosed in four candidosis and one aspergillosis patients (13%). Positive PCR, elevated D/L-arabinitol ratio, (1-->3)-beta-glucan concentration and antigens were detected in nine, 15, 17, and seven patients, respectively. The agreement between PCR and D/L-arabinitol assays was poor. However, 56% agreement was observed between positive PCR and beta-glucan and/or antigen assays, and 60% agreement between positive D/L-arabinitol and beta-glucan and/or antigen assays. Combination of several non-culture assays is needed to diagnose invasive fungal infection in high-risk transplant recipients. No single test was sufficient for diagnosis.[Combination of real-time polymerase chain reaction assay and serum galactomannan in the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in patients with hematological malignancies and recipients of hematopoietic stem cell transplantation].To evaluate the role of real-time polymerase chain reaction (real-time PCR) assay combined with serum galactomannan (GM) detection in the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) with hematological malignancies or hematopoietic stem cell transplantation.Eighty patients were enrolled. PCR and GM were performed simultaneously on 205 serum samples. The agreement between these two assays and the diagnostic value of the combination were analyzed.There were 5 proven IA, 20 probable IA, 34 possible IA and 21 non-IA. Agreement between real-time PCR and GM was 77.5%. When both positive, the positive predictive value could reach 100%; when both negative, the negative predictive value could reach 90.9%.PCR agrees well with GM. When these two assays are combined, invasive aspergillosis can be diagnosed more accurately.Randomized PCR-based therapy and risk factors for invasive fungal infection following reduced-intensity conditioning and hematopoietic SCT.Invasive fungal infections (IFIs) are major complications after allogeneic hematopoietic SCT (HSCT). PCR-based assays able to detect fungal DNA have been reported to precede clinical diagnosis of IFI. We performed a prospective study to evaluate a PCR-based pre-emptive approach. Ninety-nine patients undergoing reduced-intensity conditioning (RIC) HSCT were followed with fungal PCR during the first 100 days post transplantation. Patients who tested positive were randomized to receive liposomal amphotericin B, or to no intervention. After day 100, PCR tests were performed only on clinical suspicion of IFI. A single positive PCR test was not associated with IFI, irrespective of treatment. After day 100, PCR tests for Aspergillus did not contribute to diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA). The cumulative incidence rates of proven or probable IA during the first year after transplantation were 9%. GVHD grades II-IV (P=0.0014), CMV-seronegative recipient with CMV-seropositive donor (P0.001), and conditioning with alemtuzumab (P=0.014) were significant risk factors for developing IA in a multivariate model. In this study, PCR on peripheral blood was a poor indicator of IFI early after RIC HSCT. Aspergillus PCR tests performed on clinical suspicion after day 100 were insufficiently sensitive to be diagnostically useful.Development of a serum-based Taqman real-time PCR assay for diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis.We compared an Aspergillus fumigatus-specific Taqman real-time PCR assay for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) with the enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay Platelia Aspergillus method. Patients with proven or probable IA had positive results with at least one of the two methods. The PCR method seems to be more specific, and a combination of the two should improve the diagnosis of IA.A MIQE-compliant real-time PCR assay for Aspergillus detection.The polymerase chain reaction (PCR) is widely used as a diagnostic tool in clinical laboratories and is particularly effective for detecting and identifying infectious agents for which routine culture and microscopy methods are inadequate. Invasive fungal disease (IFD) is a major cause of morbidity and mortality in immunosuppressed patients, and optimal diagnostic criteria are contentious. Although PCR-based methods have long been used for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA), variable performance in clinical practice has limited their value. This shortcoming is a consequence of differing sample selection, collection and preparation protocols coupled with a lack of standardisation of the PCR itself. Furthermore, it has become clear that the performance of PCR-based assays in general is compromised by the inadequacy of experimental controls, insufficient optimisation of assay performance as well as lack of transparency in reporting experimental details. The recently published "Minimum Information for the publication of real-time Quantitative PCR Experiments" (MIQE) guidelines provide a blueprint for good PCR assay design and unambiguous reporting of experimental detail and results. We report the first real-time quantitative PCR (qPCR) assay targeting Aspergillus species that has been designed, optimised and validated in strict compliance with the MIQE guidelines. The hydrolysis probe-based assay, designed to target the 18S rRNA DNA sequence of Aspergillus species, has an efficiency of 100% (range 95-107%), a dynamic range of at least six orders of magnitude and limits of quantification and detection of 6 and 0.6 Aspergillus fumigatus genomes, respectively. It does not amplify Candida, Scedosporium, Fusarium or Rhizopus species and its clinical sensitivity is demonstrated in histological material from proven IA cases, as well as concordant PCR and galactomannan data in matched broncho-alveolar lavage and blood samples. The robustness, specificity and sensitivity of this assay make it an ideal molecular diagnostic tool for clinical use.Galactomannan and PCR versus culture and histology for directing use of antifungal treatment for invasive aspergillosis in high-risk haematology patients: a randomised controlled trial.Empirical treatment with antifungal drugs is often used in haematology patients at high risk of invasive aspergillosis. We compared a standard diagnostic strategy (culture and histology) with a rapid biomarker-based diagnostic strategy (aspergillus galactomannan and PCR) for directing the use of antifungal treatment in this group of patients.In this open-label, parallel-group, randomised controlled trial, eligible patients were adults undergoing allogeneic stem-cell transplantation or chemotherapy for acute leukaemia, with no history of invasive fungal disease. Enrolled patients were randomly assigned (1:1) by a computer-generated schedule to follow either a standard diagnostic strategy (based on culture and histology) or a biomarker-based diagnostic strategy (aspergillus galactomannan and PCR) to direct treatment with antifungal drugs. Patients, were followed up for 26 weeks or until death. Masking of the use of different diagnostic tests was not possible for patients, treating physicians, or investigators. The primary endpoint was empirical treatment with antifungal drugs in the 26 weeks after enrolment (for the biomarker-based diagnostic strategy, a single postive galactomannan or PCR result was deemed insufficient to confirm invasive aspergillosis, so treatment in this context was classified as empirical). This outcome was assessed by an independent data review committee from which the study allocations were masked. Analyses were by intention to treat and included all enrolled patients. This study is registered with ClinicalTrial.gov, number NCT00163722.240 eligible patients were recruited from six Australian centres between Sept 30, 2005, and Nov 19, 2009. 122 were assigned the standard diagnostic strategy and 118 the biomarker-based diagnostic strategy. 39 patients (32%) in the standard diagnosis group and 18 (15%) in the biomarker diagnosis group received empirical antifungal treatment (difference 17%, 95% CI 4-26; p=0·002). The numbers of patients who had hepatotoxic and nephrotoxic effects did not differ significantly between the standard diagnosis and biomarker diagnosis groups (hepatotoxic effects: 21 [17%] vs 12 [10%], p=0·11; nephrotoxic effects: 52 [43%] vs 60 [51%], p=0·20).Use of aspergillus galactomannan and PCR to direct treatment reduced use of empirical antifungal treatment. This approach is an effective strategy for the management of invasive aspergillosis in high-risk haematology patients.Australian National Health and Medical Research Council, Cancer Council New South Wales, Pfizer, Merck, Gilead Sciences.Diagnostic value of PCR analysis of bacteria and fungi from blood in empiric-therapy-resistant febrile neutropenia.This study aimed to assess the clinical utility of PCR for the analysis of bacteria and fungi from blood for the management of febrile neutropenic patients with hematologic malignancies. Using a PCR system able to detect a broad range of bacteria and fungi, we conducted a prospective pilot study of periodic analyses of blood from patients following intensive chemotherapy. When fever occurred, it was treated with empirical antibiotic therapy, basically without knowledge of the PCR results. In 23 febrile episodes during the neutropenic period, bacteria were detected by PCR in 11 cases, while the same species were identified by blood culture in 3 cases. In 10 out of 11 PCR-positive cases, fever could be managed by empirical therapy. In the empirical-therapy-resistant case, the identification of Stenotrophomonas maltophilia by PCR led to improvement of fever. No fungi were detected by PCR in febrile cases, while Aspergillus fumigatus was detected in one afebrile patient, several days before a clinical diagnosis was made. In subsequent sporadic PCR analyses in 15 cases of febrile neutropenia, bacteria were detected by both PCR and blood culture in 7 cases and by PCR alone in 6. Fungi were not detected. While fever was improved by empirical therapy in 12 out of the 13 PCR-positive cases, the identification of Pseudomonas aeruginosa by PCR in one therapy-resistant case contributed to the successful treatment of persistent fever. Our results indicate that PCR analysis of bacteria from blood provides essential information for managing empirical-therapy-resistant febrile neutropenia.Aspergillus PCR testing: results from a prospective PCR study within the AmBiLoad trial.Invasive fungal infection (IFI) is a major cause of morbidity and mortality in severely immunocompromised patients and is difficult to diagnose. The significance of molecular methods for diagnosis of IFI is still controversial. In a subset of patients treated within the AmBiLoad Trial, samples were investigated prospectively by a nested Aspergillus PCR assay to re-evaluate the significance of PCR in this setting.In the randomized, prospective multicenter AmBiLoad trial, patients with proven or probable IFI were randomized to receive liposomal amphotericin B (L-AMB) 3 or 10 mg/kg QD for 14 d followed by L-AMB 3 mg/kg QD. From 91 patients, 459 serial samples (98% blood samples) were investigated by a nested PCR assay for Aspergillus DNA. All samples were investigated in our laboratory with a previously described nested and a quantitative PCR assay. As required by the study protocol, serial Aspergillus antigen galactomannan was performed. IFI was defined according to modified EORTC/MSG 2002 criteria as applied in the AmBiLoad trial.Seven and 52 patients had proven and probable IFI according to modified EORTC/MSG criteria, respectively. The median number of samples investigated per patient was 4. Seventy percent of samples were obtained during treatment with antifungal study medication. Forty-three samples gave positive PCR results. Patients with an unfavorable outcome had a significantly higher rate of positive PCR results (48% versus 21%).The sensitivity of Aspergillus PCR testing is limited during antifungal therapy. The tendency for persistently positive PCR results to indicate a poor prognosis has to be confirmed in further studies.Study on invasive fungal infections in immunocompromised patients to present a suitable early diagnostic procedure.The incidence of invasive fungal infections has increased considerably in recent years. The aim of this study was to present a suitable early diagnostic procedure in immunocompromised patients, using a molecular assay.From September 2005 to January 2007, 310 immunosuppressed patients were followed for fungal infections for a 6-month period. EDTA-anticoagulant whole blood specimens were collected prospectively once per week and stored at -20 degrees C until use in molecular assays.Molecular assays were positive in 55 (17.7%) patients. The etiologic agents were Candida albicans (67.3%), Aspergillus flavus (20.0%), Aspergillus fumigatus (7.3%), Candida tropicalis (3.6%), and Candida krusei (1.8%). The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of PCR-ELISA with proven and probable invasive fungal infections were 84.6%, 92.7%, 75.3%, and 95.8%, respectively. The results showed that the mean clinical manifestation time was 38.96 days and the mean time of positivity of the molecular test (time of infection) was 17.69 days. A linear model for predicted infection and clinical manifestation time was found to be as follows: Y=11.64+1.147X, r(2)=0.812, where Y is the time at presentation of clinical signs and X is the time of infection (positive PCR-ELISA result).It may be concluded that the molecular assay would help in the diagnosis of invasive fungal infections at the early stage of infection, before clinical manifestations.Comparison of serum galactomannan antigen detection and competitive polymerase chain reaction for diagnosing invasive aspergillosis.To improve the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA), we retrospectively compared competitive polymerase chain reaction (PCR) and sandwich ELISA for detection of serum galactomannan (GM) antigen. We studied 281 serum samples collected weekly during the period at risk for IA from 41 selected hematology patients. Twenty-two patients had confirmed, probable, or suspected IA, according to clinical and mycologic data. Fifteen of them had positive GM titers (87 samples) and 12 had positive PCRs (20 samples). Nineteen of the 20 PCR-positive samples were also GM-positive. Of the 19 patients without IA (83 samples), one had 3 GM-false-positive samples. Neither test anticipated the initiation of antifungal therapy on the basis of clinical suspicion. Both tests were more likely to be positive before death. This study suggests that PCR on serum samples is not more sensitive than GM detection. However, PCR can improve the specificity of the GM test. Together, these noninvasive tests should improve the diagnosis of IA.Molecular detection and identification of Candida and Aspergillus spp. from clinical samples using real-time PCR.This report describes the development of a real-time LightCycler assay for the detection and identification of Candida and Aspergillus spp., using the MagNa Pure LC Instrument for automated extraction of fungal DNA. The assay takes 5-6 h to perform. The oligonucleotide primers and probes used for species identification were derived from the DNA sequences of the 18S rRNA genes of various fungal pathogens. All samples were screened for Aspergillus and Candida to the genus level in the real-time PCR assay. If a sample was Candida-positive, typing to species level was performed using five species-specific probes. The assay detected and identified most of the clinically relevant Aspergillus and Candida spp. with a sensitivity of 2 CFU/mL blood. Amplification was 100% specific for all Aspergillus and Candida spp. tested. To assess clinical applicability, 1,650 consecutive samples (1,330 blood samples, 295 samples from other body fluids and 25 biopsy samples) from patients with suspected invasive fungal infections were analysed. In total, 114 (6.9%) samples were PCR-positive, 5.3% for Candida and 1.7% for Aspergillus spp. In patients with positive PCR results for Candida and Aspergillus, verification with conventional methods was possible in 83% and 50% of cases, respectively. In conclusion, the real-time PCR assay allows sensitive and specific detection and identification of fungal pathogens in vitro and in vivo.Comparison of PCR-ELISA and galactomannan detection for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis.To compare PCR with galactomannan antigen detection for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA).We prospectively collected serial blood samples from haematological patients at risk of IA, and analysed their samples retrospectively for galactomannan (GM) antigen using the Platelia test and for aspergillus DNA using an in-house PCR-ELISA assay. Matched GM and PCR analyses were performed on 263 samples from 25 patients. Patients were classified for potential IA according to international consensus criteria, with five patients classified as positive (four proven, one probable) and 20 classified as negative (seven possible, 13 no evidence IA).All five patients with IA were positive by PCR with positive results in 24 of 82 samples, whereas three of five patients were positive by GM with four of 82 samples being positive. Three of 20 patients without IA were positive by PCR in 18 of 181 samples, whereas corresponding results for GM detection were one of 20 and one of 181, respectively. Adjustment of ELISA cut-off values and/or the requirement for two consecutive samples to be positive generated different results; however, lowering the positivity index (PI) for GM detection to 0.5 did not improve the sensitivity of the assay. Optimal results for PCR detection and GM were: 100% and 60% sensitivity, 85% and 95% specificity, 0.625 and 0.75 positive predictive value, and 1.0 and 0.8 negative predictive value, with a false-positive sample rate of 8 and 0.4%, positive likelihood ratio of 6.66 and 11.99 and negative likelihood ratio of 0 and 0.42, respectively.This PCR method is very sensitive for the diagnosis of IA but is associated with a moderate rate of false positives; the GM assay exhibited poor sensitivity but high specificity. Further evaluation of PCR assays for the diagnosis of IA and other invasive fungal infections is warranted.Use of real-time PCR on blood samples for diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis.We developed a new quantitative system for diagnosis of invasive pulmonary aspergillosis (IPA) using real-time automated polymerase chain reaction (PCR). Intra-assay and interassay precision rates for in vitro examination were 2.53% and 2.20%, respectively, and the linearity of this assay was obtained when there were >20 copies/well. We examined 323 samples taken from 122 patients with hematological malignancies, including 33 patients with IPA and 89 control patients. Blood samples were subjected to PCR antigen detection methods, using enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) and determination of plasma (1-->3)-beta-D-glucan (BDG) concentration. The sensitivities of PCR, ELISA, and BDG measurement for diagnosis of IPA were 79%, 58%, and 67%, respectively; the specificities were 92%, 97%, and 84%. Positive findings on PCR preceded those of computed tomography by -0.3+/-6.6 days, those of BDG measurement by 6.5+/-4.9 days, and those of ELISA by 2.8+/-4.1 days. Real-time PCR was sensitive for IPA diagnosis, and quantitation was accurate.Ribosomal and mitochondrial DNA target for real-time PCR diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis.The aim of the present study was to assess the diagnostic efficacy of a combination of two quantitative Aspergillus PCR assays, targeting a mitochondrial and a ribosomal target, in patients with risk factors for invasive aspergillosis (IA) and positive galactomannan (GM) antigen. Forty-four patients with hematological malignancies and risk factors for IA according to revised European Organization for Research on Treatment of Cancer and the Mycoses Study Group criteria (EORTC/MSG) criteria and presenting at least two sequential GM-positive sera were included in the study. Mitochondrial PCR was carried out prospectively on all GM-positive serum samples. Ribosomal PCR was carried out retrospectively on frozen stored sera. The sensitivities of mitochondrial and ribosomal PCRs were 58% and 50%, respectively. The diagnostic test performance was improved by using a combination of both PCR assays and by considering a patient PCR positive when at least two positive results were obtained. The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative likelihood ratios were 65%, 94%, and 11.8 and 0.37, respectively. A significant association between fatal outcome at 90 days and positive results of ribosomal PCR assays was observed (adjusted hazard ratio = 8.2; 95% confidence interval [CI] = 1.0 to 65.8; P = 0.048). Our results showed that the combination of two PCR assays targeting mitochondrial and ribosomal Aspergillus DNA improves the sensitivity of PCR in the diagnosis of IA in hematological patients with risk factors and positive GM results. This study also confirms that a positive PCR result is associated with a poor prognosis in these patients and should lead to specific antifungal therapy being introduced immediately.[Detection of Aspergillus infection in blood of malignant hematopoietic tumor patients by two-step polymerase chain reaction].To investigate the sensitivity and specificity of two-step PCR in detection of Aspergillus species in blood from malignant hematopoietic tumor patients.Forty-one blood samples from high-risk patients were detected with two-step PCR. The clinical applicability was assessed with analyzing computed tomography, Aspergillus culture, neutropenia and outcome after anti-fungal therapy.Specific band of PCR was obtained from Aspergillus strains and products of PCR had a high homogeneous in sequence with Aspergillus species. Sixteen of 41 patients were PCR positive and controls were all PCR negative. Among PCR positive patients, 4 patients had positive cultures. The lowest WBC count was (0.30 +/- 0.14) x 10(9)/L and (0.50 +/- 0.26) x 10(9)/L respectively and duration with WBC count less than 1.0 x 10(9)/L was (19.00 +/- 8.31) days and (12.69 +/- 6.95) days respectively in the two groups. After antifungal therapy, one of the patients with PCR positive died of chemotherapy-related early death.The two-step PCR assay allows for highly sensitive and specific detection of Aspergillus pathogens in vitro and in vivo. The detection with PCR has some value in the early diagnosis and helps us to make decision for antifungal therapy.PCR-ELISA for the early diagnosis of invasive pulmonary aspergillus infection in neutropenic patients.To evaluate a newly developed aspergillus mitochondrial gene PCR-ELISA assay for the early diagnosis of invasive pulmonary aspergillosis (IPA) in neutropenic patients.The aspergillus mitochondrial gene was chosen for the amplification target for use with a solution hybridisation assay with colorimetric end stage detection in microtitre plate format (PCR-ELISA). The study group comprised neutropenic patients undergoing febrile episodes not responding to standard antibacterial antibiotics. Patients underwent computed tomography and bronchoscopy. Bronchoalveolar lavage (BAL) fluids were examined by culture and PCR.The aspergillus mitochondrial gene PCR-ELISA was both sensitive (100%) and specific (100%) for IPA in neutropenic patients. All 12 patients with definite or probable IPA had PCR positive BAL fluids. None of the patients with undiagnosed or confirmed infections of other aetiologies were mitochondrial PCR positive. Speciation based upon amplicon size difference was possible.Aspergillus mitochondrial DNA PCR-ELISA on BAL fluid is useful in the early diagnosis of IPA in neutropenic patients alone or, potentially, as an indication for thoracic computed tomography.Assessment of the lightcycler PCR assay for diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in paediatric patients with onco-haematological diseases.A reliable diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) is hampered by the difficulty in obtaining suitable tissue samples. To evaluate the sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value (PPV) and negative predictive value (NPV) of the LightCycler PCR for the diagnosis of IA, 536 blood samples were collected over a 22-month period from 62 paediatric patients (median age 10 years, range 1-18) considered at risk of IA. The galactomannan antigen (GM) and fungal DNA were assessed on serial blood samples. IA was diagnosed in eight of 62 patients (13%): proven, five, probable, three. Sensitivity, specificity, PPV and NPV of LightCycler PCR varied according to the number of positive samples used to define positivity: 88%; 37%; 17% and 95% for single sample positivity; and 63%, 81%, 33% and 94% for serial sample positivity respectively. The concordance between positivity of LightCycler PCR assay and the diagnosis of IA was 79%. The single positivity of LightCycler PCR assay showed a good sensitivity for the diagnosis of IA in paediatric patients. The high NPV makes LightCycler PCR a promising tool in addition to GM testing to design a strategy of pre-emptive antifungal therapy, although further validation studies are needed.Establishment and application of real-time quantitative PCR for diagnosing invasive aspergillosis via the blood in hematological patients: targeting a specific sequence of Aspergillus 28S-ITS2.Invasive aspergillosis (IA) is an important cause of morbidity and mortality in immunocompromised individuals. This study was conducted to identify a desirable target DNA sequence for the diagnosis of aspergillosis using real-time quantitative polymerase chain reaction (qPCR).Genomic DNA was extracted from Aspergillus, Candida, and bacteria species, and qPCR was applied to validate a partial ribosomal DNA 28S-ITS2 sequence. Ethylenediaminetetraacetic acid-anticoagulated blood samples were collected from 72 febrile hematological patients, while total DNA was isolated from plasma and whole blood for the Aspergillus qPCR. The results were analyzed using a receiver operating characteristic curve. All cases were evaluated using the revised European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer/Invasive Fungal Infections Cooperative Group and the National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases Mycoses Study Group (EORTC/MSG) diagnostic criteria.Use of qPCR yielded positive results for 15 Aspergillus species but negative results for Candida species, bacterial strains, and human DNA. The limit of detection was one copy per microliter of DNA. Analytical sensitivity and specificity were six copies of DNA and 100%, respectively. The standard curve showed that qPCR was reliable for Aspergillus detection and that significantly more DNA copies were obtained from whole blood than from plasma (P < 0.001). At a cut-off value ≥ 25 copies/μL, the diagnostic sensitivity and specificity for IA using 28S-ITS2 qPCR were 90.9% and 73.4%, respectively.The use of qPCR with whole blood to detect and verify the 28S-ITS2 sequence is a specific and useful way to diagnose IA.Evaluation of pan-fungal PCR assay and Aspergillus antigen detection in the diagnosis of invasive fungal infections in high risk paediatric cancer patients.Profound and prolonged neutropenia following chemotherapy is a major risk factor for systemic fungal infection. As the early diagnosis of invasive fungal infection (IFI) is difficult, these infections are still associated with high morbidity and mortality. Recently, Pan-fungal polymerase chain reaction (PCR) has been a promising aid in rapid, early diagnosis of IFI. During the past few years, increasing numbers of suspected IFIs were encountered at our institution in patients with prolonged neutropenia after intensified immunosuppressive chemotherapy. The aim of this study was to investigate the diagnostic utility of both the aspergillus galactomannan (GM) antigen and the pan-fungal PCR assay in the diagnosis of IFI in high risk febrile neutropenic paediatric cancer patients. During one year period, 91 febrile neutropenic (FN) paediatric cases at high risk for developing IFI while receiving chemotherapy were investigated at National Cancer Institute, Egypt. These patients were subjected to clinical evaluation, chest CT scan, conventional blood cultures for bacterial and fungal pathogens, aspergillus GM antigen detection and PCR assay utilizing pan-fungal primers. Of the 91 FN episodes, 15 were proven IFI; whereas 27 cases were either probable (n=13) or possible IFI (n=14), and 49 were unlikely to be IFI episodes. Based on positive results for proven/probable IFI and compared to culture results, Pan-fungal PCR showed sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values of 75%, 92%, 84% and 87%; respectively. Aspergillus antigen test showed a sensitivity of 79%, specificity of 61%, positive and negative predictive values of 54% and 83%; respectively. A negative PCR in the proven and probable cases was closely related to previous antifungal therapy for a prior history of IFI. In patients at high risk for IFI, neither the sensitivity, nor specificity of the GM test was sufficient. The results of PCR assay was reasonably specific but not very sensitive and had a chance of missing the diagnosis of IFI. The PCR assay seems a promising test for objectively defining IFI, but is not recommended as the only tool for diagnosing IFI. Combining microscopy, culture, and PCR may improve the diagnostic outcome.Clinical utility of a panfungal polymerase chain reaction assay for invasive fungal diseases in patients with haematologic disorders.Invasive fungal diseases (IFDs) are life-threatening events in patients with haematologic disorders, and the spectrum of the aetiological pathogens continues to expand. This study aimed to evaluate the clinical utility of a panfungal polymerase chain reaction (PCR) assay for the management of IFDs in such patients.We prospectively analysed 273 consecutive blood samples from 64 risk episodes in 51 patients with haematologic disorders at high risk for IFD who were treated at our hospital between April 2007 and October 2010.PCR-positive results were obtained in 18 of 64 risk episodes (35.3%). IFD was documented in 14 episodes (21.9%, 9 probable IFDs and 5 possible IFDs) according to the revised criteria of the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer/Mycoses Study Group. PCR was positive in all of these 14 episodes, and in 4 of the 50 episodes with no IFD category. Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value of our assay were 100%, 92%, 78% and 100% respectively. A considerable number of fungi (44.4%) that are less common than Aspergillus and Candida species were positive by PCR. Molecular diagnoses of Cunninghamella species, Aspergillus ustus, Fusarium species, Scedosporium apiospermum, Rhodotorula species and Rhizopus species were beneficial in selecting suitable treatments.Our panfungal PCR approach allows for the highly sensitive and specific detection and identification of a wide spectrum of fungal pathogens, which provides indispensable information for managing IFDs, especially refractory or breakthrough IFDs during antifungal therapy in high-risk patients with haematologic disorders.Prospective evaluation of a polymerase chain reaction-ELISA targeted to Aspergillus fumigatus and Aspergillus flavus for the early diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in patients with hematological malignancies.Current laboratory and radiological methods for diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) lack sensitivity and specificity.We prospectively evaluated the diagnostic value of twice-weekly screening for circulating Aspergillus fumigatus and A. flavus DNA with a polymerase chain reaction-enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (PCR-ELISA).Among the 201 adult patients with hematological malignancies who were included in the study, 55 IA cases were diagnosed. On the basis of the analysis of 1205 serum samples from 167 patients, the sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of the PCR-ELISA for proven and probable IA cases were 63.6%, 89.7%, 63.6%, and 89.7%, respectively, when samples with 2 consecutive positive results were used. The use of a combination of the PCR-ELISA and a galactomannan (GM) assay increased the sensitivity to 83.3%, increased the negative predictive value to 97.6%, and decreased the specificity to 69.8%. In most patients with IA, PCR-ELISA positivity anticipated or was simultaneous with the initiation of antifungal therapy, the abnormalities found by computed tomography, the mycological/histological diagnosis, and the GM positivity. Overall, 56.3% of the patients had at least 1 positive sample, and the false single-positive rate was 44.8%.In addition to serial screening for GM antigenemia and radiological surveillance, PCR-ELISA may improve the rates of early diagnosis of IA and the management of patients with hematological malignancies.Utility of a commercially available multiplex real-time PCR assay to detect bacterial and fungal pathogens in febrile neutropenia.Infection is the main treatment-related cause of mortality in cancer patients. Rapid and accurate diagnosis to facilitate specific therapy of febrile neutropenia is therefore urgently warranted. Here, we evaluated a commercial PCR-based kit to detect the DNA of 20 different pathogens (SeptiFast) in the setting of febrile neutropenia after chemotherapy. Seven hundred eighty-four serum samples of 119 febrile neutropenic episodes (FNEs) in 70 patients with hematological malignancies were analyzed and compared with clinical, microbiological, and biochemical findings. In the antibiotic-naïve setting, bacteremia was diagnosed in 34 FNEs and 11 of them yielded the same result in the PCR. Seventy-three FNEs were negative in both systems, leading to an overall agreement in 84 of 119 FNEs (71%). During antibiotic therapy, positivity in blood culture occurred only in 3% of cases, but the PCR yielded a positive result in 15% of cases. In six cases the PCR during antibiotic treatment detected a new pathogen repetitively; this was accompanied by a significant rise in procalcitonin levels, suggestive of a true detection of infection. All patients with probable invasive fungal infection (IFI; n = 3) according to the standards of the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer had a positive PCR result for Aspergillus fumigatus; in contrast there was only one positive result for Aspergillus fumigatus in an episode without signs and symptoms of IFI. Our results demonstrate that the SeptiFast kit cannot replace blood cultures in the diagnostic workup of FNEs. However, it might be helpful in situations where blood cultures remain negative (e.g., during antimicrobial therapy or in IFI).Pathogen-specific DNA enrichment does not increase sensitivity of PCR for diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in neutropenic patients.PCR assays designed for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) in high-risk patients have to detect minute amounts of target DNA to reach sufficient analytical sensitivity to be of clinical use. This prospective study assessed the use of a novel strategy for selective pathogen DNA enrichment for enhancing the performance of diagnostic PCR in a direct comparison with a highly sensitive in-house quantitative PCR (qPCR) assay and the galactomannan enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA). Surprisingly, and in contrast to experience with other patient groups, the novel protocol for selective pathogen DNA enrichment did not enhance but instead significantly impaired sensitivity. This could be explained by the small amounts of host DNA in the specimens, which were derived mostly from severely neutropenic patients. In the qPCR assay, positive samples required an average of 43.5 amplification cycles (range, 39.2 to 50) for detection in the in-house PCR. Repetitive testing of selected samples showed test positivity to be variable, most likely due to the small amounts of target DNA. Despite this, the in-house protocol proved helpful in the diagnosis of IA, detecting 2 out of 3 patients with probable IA and 10 out of 19 patients with possible IA. Our results underline the necessity for diagnostic PCR protocols that help diagnose IA to be highly sensitive and show that selective pathogen DNA enrichment using affinity purification may not be useful in severely neutropenic patients.Detection of Aspergillus spp. in biological samples by real-time PCR.Recently, the proportion of invasive infections caused by the filamentous fungi of the Aspergillus genus are growing in immunocompromised persons particularly in transplant recipients and neutropenic patients. Unfortunately, laboratory diagnostics of invasive aspergillosis remains extremely difficult, mainly with regard to the sensitivity of the methods and to the correct interpretation of the results in particular.The aim of this work was to design a standard and reproducible Aspergillus DNA detection method and its validation. The second aim was to practically use this method for diagnosis of Aspergillus DNA in various samples in patients.Real-time PCR with two hybridization probes. Amplification and on-line quantification was carried out on a LightCycler 1.5 Instrument.Specificity of the reaction was tested for A. fumigatus, A. flavus, A. niger and A. terreus, and its sensitivity was determined at 5 copies per ml. The reproducibility of the results was comparable to other methods, reported in the literature. Applicability of the real-time PCR was assessed for detection of Aspergillus DNA in 354 various clinical samples taken from 179 patients at risk of invasive aspergillosis over the period of 33 months. Of 354 samples 103 (29.10 %) taken from 65 patients (36.31 %) were evaluated as positive. Over one year, the percentage of positive samples was mostly about 30 % or less per month.Our results demonstrate the high sensitivity, specificity and reproducibility of this technique, and its usefulness for rapid laboratory diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis.Role of prospective screening of blood for invasive aspergillosis by polymerase chain reaction in febrile neutropenic recipients of haematopoietic stem cell transplants and patients with acute leukaemia.Guidelines for the use of polymerase chain reaction (PCR)-based assays to aid the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) in high-risk haematology patients have not been formulated. We prospectively evaluated a nested PCR assay to detect Aspergillus in blood during 95 febrile neutropenic episodes, in patients with haematological malignancy and haematopoietic stem cell transplant (HSCT) recipients. PCR results were correlated with the diagnostic classification of the 2002 European Organisation for Research and Treatment of Cancer/Mycosis Study Group. When two-positive results were used to define an episode as 'PCR positive', the sensitivity, specificity, positive-predictive value and negative predictive value for 'proven'/'probable' IA (n = 13) were 100%, 75.4%, 46.4% and 100%, respectively. Consecutive positive results occurred in 61.5% of these 13 episodes. Overall, PCR positivity preceded standard diagnosis by a mean of 14 d and the median time between positive results was shorter than that in other categories of IA. All 13 episodes occurred in the setting of allogeneic HSCT recipients and acute leukaemia. If 'eligibility' for antifungal therapy were based on two-positive-PCR tests, use of empiric treatment could have been reduced by up to 37%. The nested PCR assay is a practical screening test for excluding IA. Patients with consecutive positive results or intermittent-positive results (within 14 d) warrant immediate investigations for IA and the initiation of antifungal therapy.Detection of circulating Aspergillus fumigatus DNA by real-time PCR assay of large serum volumes improves early diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in high-risk adult patients under hematologic surveillance.Detection of galactomannan antigen (GMA) in serum is the standard assay for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) in high-risk patients with hematological disorders. Detection of Aspergillus DNA in serum has been proposed, but its sensitivity is lower than that of GMA when small serum volumes (SSV) are used. In this study, we investigated whether extraction of DNA from large serum volumes (LSV) improves diagnostic yield. In a 13-month prospective study, we compared the performances of twice-weekly screening of serum for GMA by an enzyme immunoassay and weekly screening for Aspergillus fumigatus DNA by a real-time PCR (RT-PCR) assay of 1.0 ml (LSV) or 100 mul (SSV) of serum. We included 124 patients (138 treatment episodes), with 17 episodes of EORTC (European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer)/MSG (Mycoses Study Group)-documented IA. In all, 1,870 samples were screened for GMA. The sensitivity (Se), specificity (Sp), and positive and negative predictive values (PPV and NPV, respectively) of GMA for IA were 88.2%, 95.8%, 75%, and 98.3%, respectively. We screened 938 samples for Aspergillus DNA by using LSV; 404 of these samples were also tested with SSV. The Se, Sp, PPV, and NPV of RT-PCR were 100%, 96.7%, 81%, and 100%, respectively, with LSV and 76.5%, 96.7%, 81.3%, and 95.6%, respectively, with SSV. DNA detection gave a positive result when performed on LSV in two cases of IA where the GMA assay result remained negative. Furthermore, in four IA cases, DNA was detected earlier than GMA. The use of LSV for extraction improved the performance of the RT-PCR, which appears highly sensitive and specific for the early diagnosis of IA in high-risk patients with hematological disorders.Monochrome LightCycler PCR assay for detection and quantification of five common species of Candida and Aspergillus.Invasive fungal pathogens, especially in immunocompromised hosts, can result in life-threatening infections. Current laboratory/radiological methods for fungal identification are time-consuming and lack sensitivity and specificity. A monochrome, multiplex, real-time PCR assay for the identification and quantification of Candida albicans, Candida krusei, Candida tropicalis, Aspergillus flavus and Aspergillus fumigatus is described here. Detection of each of these fungi was specific and demonstrated 100 % concordance with biochemical/culture identification in all 60 isolates tested. Samples from 16 febrile neutropenic patients with haematological malignancies were also analysed and the utility of the assay in clinical samples was reconfirmed without false-negative results. The sensitivity of this assay was 0.1 pg fungal genomic DNA, corresponding to three cells, for C. albicans, C. krusei, C. tropicalis and A. flavus, and 0.01 pg fungal genomic DNA, i.e. less than one cell, for A. fumigatus. The analysis allows a low-cost, simple, rapid and sensitive alternative for clinical identification and quantification of these five common fungal species.Prospective comparison of the diagnostic potential of real-time PCR, double-sandwich enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay for galactomannan, and a (1-->3)-beta-D-glucan test in weekly screening for invasive aspergillosis in patients with hematological disorders.The establishment of an optimal noninvasive method for diagnosing invasive aspergillosis (IA) is needed to improve the management of this life-threatening infection in patients with hematological disorders, and a number of noninvasive tests for IA that target different fungal components, including galactomannan, (1-->3)-beta-d-glucan (BDG), and Aspergillus DNA, have been developed. In this study, we prospectively evaluated the diagnostic potential of three noninvasive tests for IA that were used in a weekly screening strategy: the double-sandwich enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) for galactomannan (Platelia Aspergillus), a real-time PCR assay for Aspergillus DNA (GeniQ-Asper), and an assay for BDG (beta-glucan Wako). We analyzed 149 consecutive treatment episodes in 96 patients with hematological disorders who were at high risk for IA and diagnosed 9 proven IA cases, 2 probable IA cases, and 13 possible invasive fugal infections. In a receiver-operating characteristic (ROC) analysis, the area under the ROC curve was greatest for ELISA, using two consecutive positive results (0.97; P = 0.036 for ELISA versus PCR, P = 0.055 for ELISA versus BDG). Based on the ROC curve, the cutoff for the ELISA could be reduced to an optical density index (O.D.I.) of 0.6. With the use of this cutoff for ELISA and cutoffs for PCR and BDG that give a comparable level of specificity, the sensitivity/specificity/positive predictive value/negative predictive value of the ELISA and the PCR and BDG tests were 1.00/0.93/0.55/1.00, 0.55/0.93/0.40/0.96, and 0.55/0.93/0.40/0.96, respectively. In conclusion, among these weekly screening tests for IA, the double-sandwich ELISA test was the most sensitive at predicting the diagnosis of IA in high-risk patients with hematological disorders, using a reduced cutoff of 0.6 O.D.I.Multicenter comparison of serum and whole-blood specimens for detection of Aspergillus DNA in high-risk hematological patients.Samples from patients at high risk for invasive aspergillosis (IA) were prospectively collected and analyzed for the presence of molecular markers of fungal infection. Serum specimens were screened for galactomannan and Aspergillus DNA, and whole-blood specimens were screened only for Aspergillus DNA. Fungal infections were categorized according to the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer/Invasive Fungal Infections Cooperative Group, National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases Mycoses Study Group (EORTC/MSG) criteria. Forty-seven cases (proven and probable IA) and 31 controls (no evidence of IA) were selected retrospectively for this case-control study, comprising 803 samples, in order to determine the performance of whole-blood PCR, serum PCR, and serum galactomannan testing. Although no single assay was able to detect every case of IA, a combination of different assays provided the best performance. There was no significant difference between the use of whole-blood and serum specimens for PCR-based diagnosis of IA, but there was a trend for whole blood to be more sensitive (85% versus 79%) and to yield an earlier positive result (36 days versus 15 days) than for serum. However, DNA extraction from serum specimens is easier and faster than that from whole-blood specimens, and it allows the same specimen to be used for both galactomannan and PCR assays. In conclusion, the appropriate sample type for DNA extraction should be determined by the local requirements and the technical platforms available at each individual center. A combination of biomarker tests offered the best diagnostic utility for detecting IA.Application of nucleic acid sequence-based amplification for diagnosis of and monitoring the clinical course of invasive aspergillosis in patients with hematologic diseases.We evaluated nucleic acid sequence-based amplification (NASBA) and a galactomannan enzyme immunosorbent assay (GM-EIA) for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) in neutropenic febrile patients and for monitoring of its clinical course and outcome. Blood samples were collected twice per week from 128 patients with hematologic diseases during periods of neutropenic fever after undergoing chemotherapy or hematopoietic stem cell transplantation. A total of 448 blood samples were tested.There were 14 patients with IA (2 patients with proven IA and 12 with probable IA). The median index of the initial NASBA in the IA group was more than 10-fold higher than that in the non-IA group. Galactomannan antigenemia (index, >0.5) was detected with a sensitivity of 86%. In receiver-operator characteristic analysis, the cutoff index of NASBA for the presumptive diagnosis of IA was determined to be 5.0. Combination of these 2 parameters (either a GM-EIA index of >or=0.5 or a NASBA index of >or=5.0) improved the sensitivity of diagnosis to 100%. There was a close relationship between patient outcome and the kinetics of NASBA values: failure of negative conversion during treatment resulted in death in almost all cases.If either GM-EIA or NASBA results suggest IA, the diagnostic yield for IA could be improved, and NASBA could be a useful marker for predicting the clinical course and outcome of treatment.Analysis of performance of a PCR-based assay to detect DNA of Aspergillus fumigatus in whole blood and serum: a comparative study with clinical samples.The performance of a real-time PCR-based assay was retrospectively analyzed (according to European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer/Mycosis Study Group criteria) in the samples of patients with invasive aspergillosis. A total of 711 serial samples (356 whole-blood and 355 serum samples) from 38 adult patients were analyzed. The Aspergillus fumigatus PCR assay results were positive for 89 of 356 (25%) whole-blood samples and 90 of 355 (25.35%) serum samples. Positive PCR results were seen in 29 of 31 (93.5%) patients for which serum was analyzed and in 31 of 33 (93.9%) cases with whole-blood specimens. Both blood and serum samples were available in 26 cases, and significant differences were not observed in this subgroup of cases. The average number of threshold cycles (C(T)) for positive blood samples was 37.6, and the average C(T) for serum was 37.4. The DNA concentration ranged between 2 and 50 fg per μl of sample, with average DNA concentrations of 10.2 and 11.7 fg in positive blood and serum samples, respectively (P > 0.01). The performance of this PCR-based quantitative assay was similar for both serum and blood samples. We recommend serum samples as the most convenient hematological sample to use for Aspergillus DNA quantification when serial determinations are done.Value of serial quantification of fungal DNA by a real-time PCR-based technique for early diagnosis of invasive Aspergillosis in patients with febrile neutropenia.A study was designed to assess the reliability of the serial detection of Aspergillus sp. DNA to diagnose invasive aspergillosis (IA) in patients with febrile neutropenia. Two blood and two serum samples were taken weekly from 83 patients. A total of 2,244 samples were analyzed by real-time quantitative PCR. Twelve (14.4%) patients were diagnosed with IA. Taking two consecutive positive results as the diagnostic criterion, PCR detected 11 cases, with 4 false positives, giving sensitivity, specificity, positive, and negative predictive values of 91.6%, 94.4%, 73.3%, and 98.5%, respectively. On analyzing in conjunction with high-resolution chest tomography (HRCT) and galactomannan (GM) testing, the combination of serial PCR and GM detected 100% of aspergillosis cases, with a positive predictive value of 75.1%. This diagnostic strategy presented, according to CART analysis, a receiver-operator curve with an area under the curve of 0.97 (95% confidence interval, 0.895 to 1.032; P < 0.01), with a relative risk of IA 6.92 times higher than the control population and with predictive success of 95.2%. As regards early diagnosis, the serial detection of Aspergillus DNA took on average 21 days less than HRCT and 68 days less than GM. The serial detection of Aspergillus DNA using real-time quantitative PCR has great diagnostic applicability, which increases when combined with GM quantification.Screening for Aspergillus spp. using polymerase chain reaction of whole blood samples from patients with haematological malignancies.Sensitive screening for Aspergillus spp. using polymerase chain reaction (PCR) of whole blood samples in patients with haematological disorders has not been performed to date. In a 2-year study, 121 patients admitted to the University Hospital of Innsbruck for cancer chemotherapy without clinical signs of fungal infection were prospectively screened for Aspergillus spp. In 28 out of 121 (23%) patients, Aspergillus DNAaemia was detected. Of these patients, 16 (57%) were positive only once for Aspergillus DNA, but positivity was never associated with invasive aspergillosis. PCR positive episodes were short and resolved without antifungal treatment. Five patients (18%) had intermittent PCR positive results. Seven (25%) patients presented at least two consecutive positive PCR results; one of these patients developed invasive aspergillosis and another two were strongly suspected as having aspergillosis. Based on the criteria of the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer case definitions, sensitivity and specificity of serial PCR monitoring were 75% and 96%. Positive PCR results became negative shortly after commencement of antifungal treatment, but the changes did not correlate with clinical responsiveness to treatment in three patients. Our results indicate the potential usefulness of PCR for screening for Aspergillus spp. in patients at risk, but without antifungal treatment.Detection of Aspergillus species in blood and bronchoalveolar lavage samples from immunocompromised patients by means of 2-step polymerase chain reaction: clinical results.Bronchoalveolar lavage (BAL) samples from 67 patients who were at high risk for invasive aspergillosis were examined using a recently developed 2-step polymerase chain reaction (PCR) that detects </=10 fg of Aspergillus DNA in blood and BAL samples in vitro. Thirteen of these patients had PCR and diagnostic results positive for Aspergillus infection. Four patients with possible invasive aspergillosis also had positive PCR results, and the remaining 50 had negative PCR results. In addition, 907 blood samples from 218 high-risk patients were screened. Thirty-three patients with positive PCR results had invasive aspergillosis; 148 patients had PCR and diagnostic results that were negative, and 34 patients with positive PCR results had nonconclusive clinical data. Both blood and BAL testing were performed for 45 patients. All 8 patients with proven invasive aspergillosis showed concordance of positive PCR results. Our data suggest that this PCR method has possible clinical value for confirming and improving the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in high-risk patients.Early detection of aspergillus infection after allogeneic stem cell transplantation by polymerase chain reaction screening.Invasive aspergillosis (IA) has become a major cause of mortality in patients after allogeneic stem cell transplantation. To assess the potential of prospective polymerase chain reaction (PCR) screening for early diagnosis of IA, 84 recipients of an allogeneic stem cell transplant were analyzed with the investigators blinded to clinical and microbiologic data. Of 1193 blood samples analyzed, 169 (14.2%) were positive by PCR. In patients with newly diagnosed IA (n=7), PCR positivity preceded the first clinical signs by a median of 2 days (range, 1-23 days) and preceded clinical diagnosis of IA by a median of 9 days (range, 2-34 days). Pretransplantation IA (relative risk [RR], 2.37), acute graft-versus-host disease (RR, 2.75), and corticosteroid treatment (RR, 6.5) were associated with PCR positivity. The PCR assay revealed a sensitivity of 100% (95% confidence interval [CI], 48%-100%) and a specificity of 65% (95% CI, 53%-75%). None of the PCR-negative patients developed IA during the study period. Thus, prospective PCR screening allows for identification of patients at high risk for subsequent onset of IA.Detection of Aspergillus species in bone marrow transplant patients.Invasive aspergillosis is a severe complication of cytotoxic chemotherapies and bone marrow transplantation (BMT). The aim of this study was to assess the utility of a real-time PCR assay for the early diagnosis of Aspergillus species in blood samples from BMT patients.Blood specimens (n = 993) from patients (n = 82) scheduled for BMT were collected prior to transplant and for 100 days post transplantation. The specimens were later tested using an Aspergillus-specific real-time PCR assay. Cultures of clinical samples, along with sonography and computerized tomographic scans, were performed as standard of care.Aspergillus DNA was positive in 94 sequential blood samples from 13 patients with clinical and radiological signs of infection. Samples from three of these patients were PCR-positive for Aspergillus in the first week of admission, prior to transplantation. Four patients with aspergillosis were cured with antifungal agents and nine died. An additional 12 patients without clinical signs of infection were PCR-positive on one occasion each, while two patients with clinical signs of infection were PCR-negative. Compared to routine methods of aspergillosis diagnosis, the respective sensitivity, specificity, negative, and positive predictive values of the PCR method by patient were 86.6%, 82%, 96.5% and 52%.The results show that Aspergillus infections in the blood of bone marrow transplant patients can be dectected by PCR methods. Early detection of Aspergillus infections by PCR has the potential to positively impact patient mortality rate and provide cost savings to hospitals.Molecular detection of invasive aspergillosis in hematologic malignancies.Aspergillus species are the most frequent causes of invasive mold infections in immunocompromised patients, particularly those who underwent chemotherapy for hematologic malignancies. The aim of this study was to determine the incidence and efficiency of the PCR-enzyme linked immunosorbent assay method (PCR-ELISA) for early detection of Aspergillus species in patients with hematologic malignancies.From 2004 to 2006, 194 patients with hematologic malignancies (who received chemotherapy) were evaluated for invasive aspergillosis (IA) in Shiraz, southern Iran. Ethylenediaminetetraacetic acid anticoagulant whole blood samples were collected prospectively once a week and stored at -20 degrees C until examination. All collected blood samples were assayed for the presence of the bands on ethidium bromide stained gel and for hybridization.The female-to-male ratio was 61:133, the mean age of patients was 33.7 years, and mean of hospitalization period was 21.2 days. PCR-ELISA was positive in 14 (7.2%) patients who exhibited clinical and radiologic signs of IA. The etiologic agents were Aspergillus flavus (11 cases) and Aspergillus fumigatus (three cases). The mean time of positivity of PCR-ELISA in the blood before the appearance of clinical signs was 12.6 days. PCR was found to be the earliest indicator of IA preceding nonspecific clinical and radiologic findings. The sensitivity, specificity, positive, and negative predictive values of PCR-ELISA to detect DNA-specific for Aspergillus species in patients with proven and probable IA were 66%, 96%, 62.5%, and 97%, respectively. In case patients were treated with antifungal drugs, and the treatment was successful, fungal PCR assay became negative after 14 days and if the treatment failed, assay was positive until death.We demonstrated, in the present study, the incidence of IA in leukemic patients and the usefulness of molecular assay for early diagnosis and monitoring of the treatment of IA.Specific detection of Aspergillus species in blood and bronchoalveolar lavage samples of immunocompromised patients by two-step PCR.The increasing incidence of aspergillosis, a life-threatening infection in immunocompromised patients, emphasizes the need to improve the currently limited diagnostic tools. We developed a two-step PCR assay that specifically amplifies a region of the 18S rRNA gene that is highly conserved in Aspergillus species. A number of primers with the least homology to equivalent human or Candida gene sequences were screened for the pairs that gave the highest sensitivity and specificity. No cross-reaction with the wide range of fungal and bacterial pathogens so far tested was observed. This assay allows direct and rapid detection of down to 10 fg of Aspergillus DNA corresponding to 1 to 5 CFU per ml of blood. A total of 315 blood and bronchoalveolar lavage samples from 140 subjects, including 93 patients at risk for invasive fungal disease, were screened. The result was a 100% correlation between positive histology, culture, or high-resolution computed tomography findings and PCR results. The test specificity was 89%. Our data point to the considerable potential clinical value of this simple, specific, rapid, and inexpensive PCR assay for improving the means of early diagnosis of systemic aspergillosis in high-risk patients.Prospective screening by a panfungal polymerase chain reaction assay in patients at risk for fungal infections: implications for the management of febrile neutropenia.Invasive fungal infections are a major cause of mortality in neutropenic cancer patients. To determine whether a polymerase chain reaction (PCR)-based assay enabled the identification of patients at risk for invasive fungal infections, a prospective monitoring once per week was performed during 92 neutropenic episodes in patients receiving chemotherapy for acute leukaemia or high-dose therapy followed by allogeneic or autologous stem cell transplantation, with the investigators blinded to clinical and microbiological data. PCR positivity was documented in 34 out of 92 risk episodes. All patients developing proven invasive fungal infection were found PCR positive, and PCR was found to be the earliest indicator of invasive fungal infection preceding clinical evidence by a mean of 5.75 d (range 0-14 d). In febrile neutropenic patients without a prior history of invasive fungal infection, a sensitivity of 100% and a specificity of 73% of the PCR assay for the development of proven or probable invasive fungal infection was documented. In conclusion, panfungal PCR performed prospectively once a week enabled the identification of patients at high risk for invasive fungal infections.Development of a nested qualitative real-time PCR assay to detect Aspergillus species DNA in clinical specimens.We adapted a nested Aspergillus PCR to a nested qualitative real-time format on a Light Cycler system. An evaluation using 134 clinical specimens showed that the real-time PCR assay significantly reduced the time for results to be made available without compromising sensitivity and was less labor-intensive. Its use will aid in the rapid diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis.PCR and other non-culture methods for diagnosis of invasive Candida infections in allogeneic bone marrow and solid organ transplant recipients.In this prospective study 197 serum and 152 urine samples were collected from 40 bone marrow and solid organ transplant recipients with clinically suspected invasive fungal infection before, during and after empirical treatment with lipid formulation of amphotericin B or fluconazole. Serum was analysed by Candida polymerase chain reaction (PCR) and urine by measurement of D/L-arabinitol ratio. One serum from each patient was also tested for concentration of (1-->3)-beta-glucan and two commercial Candida antigens. Invasive fungal infection was diagnosed in four candidosis and one aspergillosis patients (13%). Positive PCR, elevated D/L-arabinitol ratio, (1-->3)-beta-glucan concentration and antigens were detected in nine, 15, 17, and seven patients, respectively. The agreement between PCR and D/L-arabinitol assays was poor. However, 56% agreement was observed between positive PCR and beta-glucan and/or antigen assays, and 60% agreement between positive D/L-arabinitol and beta-glucan and/or antigen assays. Combination of several non-culture assays is needed to diagnose invasive fungal infection in high-risk transplant recipients. No single test was sufficient for diagnosis.[Combination of real-time polymerase chain reaction assay and serum galactomannan in the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in patients with hematological malignancies and recipients of hematopoietic stem cell transplantation].To evaluate the role of real-time polymerase chain reaction (real-time PCR) assay combined with serum galactomannan (GM) detection in the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) with hematological malignancies or hematopoietic stem cell transplantation.Eighty patients were enrolled. PCR and GM were performed simultaneously on 205 serum samples. The agreement between these two assays and the diagnostic value of the combination were analyzed.There were 5 proven IA, 20 probable IA, 34 possible IA and 21 non-IA. Agreement between real-time PCR and GM was 77.5%. When both positive, the positive predictive value could reach 100%; when both negative, the negative predictive value could reach 90.9%.PCR agrees well with GM. When these two assays are combined, invasive aspergillosis can be diagnosed more accurately.Randomized PCR-based therapy and risk factors for invasive fungal infection following reduced-intensity conditioning and hematopoietic SCT.Invasive fungal infections (IFIs) are major complications after allogeneic hematopoietic SCT (HSCT). PCR-based assays able to detect fungal DNA have been reported to precede clinical diagnosis of IFI. We performed a prospective study to evaluate a PCR-based pre-emptive approach. Ninety-nine patients undergoing reduced-intensity conditioning (RIC) HSCT were followed with fungal PCR during the first 100 days post transplantation. Patients who tested positive were randomized to receive liposomal amphotericin B, or to no intervention. After day 100, PCR tests were performed only on clinical suspicion of IFI. A single positive PCR test was not associated with IFI, irrespective of treatment. After day 100, PCR tests for Aspergillus did not contribute to diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA). The cumulative incidence rates of proven or probable IA during the first year after transplantation were 9%. GVHD grades II-IV (P=0.0014), CMV-seronegative recipient with CMV-seropositive donor (P0.001), and conditioning with alemtuzumab (P=0.014) were significant risk factors for developing IA in a multivariate model. In this study, PCR on peripheral blood was a poor indicator of IFI early after RIC HSCT. Aspergillus PCR tests performed on clinical suspicion after day 100 were insufficiently sensitive to be diagnostically useful.Development of a serum-based Taqman real-time PCR assay for diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis.We compared an Aspergillus fumigatus-specific Taqman real-time PCR assay for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) with the enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay Platelia Aspergillus method. Patients with proven or probable IA had positive results with at least one of the two methods. The PCR method seems to be more specific, and a combination of the two should improve the diagnosis of IA.The prospective evaluation of a nested polymerase chain reaction assay for the early detection of Aspergillus infection in patients with leukaemia or undergoing allograft treatment.Patients with acute leukaemia or undergoing allogenic bone marrow transplantation at University College London Hospital Trust were screened for the presence of aspergillosis by polymerase chain reaction (PCR). Aspergillus DNA, from whole blood samples, was amplified by nested PCR to detect a 135 bp fragment in the mitochondrial region of Aspergillus fumigatus or A. flavus (121 bp). One colony-forming unit (CFU) per 2 ml of blood or 1-10 fg DNA could be detected. Patients at risk of aspergillosis were classified as probable or possible based on the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer definitions. Antifungal drugs given were recorded. In four of 17 patients studied, infection was not suspected and the PCR was negative. Four patients were considered to have possible aspergillosis infection and were PCR positive on at least one occasion. Of the three patients in the probable group, four of the nine samples tested PCR positive from one patient and in another patient only one of nine samples tested positive. The remaining six patients were not suspected of having fungal infection but each had one or two PCR-positive results. In summary, six of seven patients thought to have clinical evidence of infection were PCR positive on at least one occasion and treatment with antifungals may have reduced infection below detectable levels.A MIQE-compliant real-time PCR assay for Aspergillus detection.The polymerase chain reaction (PCR) is widely used as a diagnostic tool in clinical laboratories and is particularly effective for detecting and identifying infectious agents for which routine culture and microscopy methods are inadequate. Invasive fungal disease (IFD) is a major cause of morbidity and mortality in immunosuppressed patients, and optimal diagnostic criteria are contentious. Although PCR-based methods have long been used for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA), variable performance in clinical practice has limited their value. This shortcoming is a consequence of differing sample selection, collection and preparation protocols coupled with a lack of standardisation of the PCR itself. Furthermore, it has become clear that the performance of PCR-based assays in general is compromised by the inadequacy of experimental controls, insufficient optimisation of assay performance as well as lack of transparency in reporting experimental details. The recently published "Minimum Information for the publication of real-time Quantitative PCR Experiments" (MIQE) guidelines provide a blueprint for good PCR assay design and unambiguous reporting of experimental detail and results. We report the first real-time quantitative PCR (qPCR) assay targeting Aspergillus species that has been designed, optimised and validated in strict compliance with the MIQE guidelines. The hydrolysis probe-based assay, designed to target the 18S rRNA DNA sequence of Aspergillus species, has an efficiency of 100% (range 95-107%), a dynamic range of at least six orders of magnitude and limits of quantification and detection of 6 and 0.6 Aspergillus fumigatus genomes, respectively. It does not amplify Candida, Scedosporium, Fusarium or Rhizopus species and its clinical sensitivity is demonstrated in histological material from proven IA cases, as well as concordant PCR and galactomannan data in matched broncho-alveolar lavage and blood samples. The robustness, specificity and sensitivity of this assay make it an ideal molecular diagnostic tool for clinical use.Galactomannan and PCR versus culture and histology for directing use of antifungal treatment for invasive aspergillosis in high-risk haematology patients: a randomised controlled trial.Empirical treatment with antifungal drugs is often used in haematology patients at high risk of invasive aspergillosis. We compared a standard diagnostic strategy (culture and histology) with a rapid biomarker-based diagnostic strategy (aspergillus galactomannan and PCR) for directing the use of antifungal treatment in this group of patients.In this open-label, parallel-group, randomised controlled trial, eligible patients were adults undergoing allogeneic stem-cell transplantation or chemotherapy for acute leukaemia, with no history of invasive fungal disease. Enrolled patients were randomly assigned (1:1) by a computer-generated schedule to follow either a standard diagnostic strategy (based on culture and histology) or a biomarker-based diagnostic strategy (aspergillus galactomannan and PCR) to direct treatment with antifungal drugs. Patients, were followed up for 26 weeks or until death. Masking of the use of different diagnostic tests was not possible for patients, treating physicians, or investigators. The primary endpoint was empirical treatment with antifungal drugs in the 26 weeks after enrolment (for the biomarker-based diagnostic strategy, a single postive galactomannan or PCR result was deemed insufficient to confirm invasive aspergillosis, so treatment in this context was classified as empirical). This outcome was assessed by an independent data review committee from which the study allocations were masked. Analyses were by intention to treat and included all enrolled patients. This study is registered with ClinicalTrial.gov, number NCT00163722.240 eligible patients were recruited from six Australian centres between Sept 30, 2005, and Nov 19, 2009. 122 were assigned the standard diagnostic strategy and 118 the biomarker-based diagnostic strategy. 39 patients (32%) in the standard diagnosis group and 18 (15%) in the biomarker diagnosis group received empirical antifungal treatment (difference 17%, 95% CI 4-26; p=0·002). The numbers of patients who had hepatotoxic and nephrotoxic effects did not differ significantly between the standard diagnosis and biomarker diagnosis groups (hepatotoxic effects: 21 [17%] vs 12 [10%], p=0·11; nephrotoxic effects: 52 [43%] vs 60 [51%], p=0·20).Use of aspergillus galactomannan and PCR to direct treatment reduced use of empirical antifungal treatment. This approach is an effective strategy for the management of invasive aspergillosis in high-risk haematology patients.Australian National Health and Medical Research Council, Cancer Council New South Wales, Pfizer, Merck, Gilead Sciences.Diagnostic value of PCR analysis of bacteria and fungi from blood in empiric-therapy-resistant febrile neutropenia.This study aimed to assess the clinical utility of PCR for the analysis of bacteria and fungi from blood for the management of febrile neutropenic patients with hematologic malignancies. Using a PCR system able to detect a broad range of bacteria and fungi, we conducted a prospective pilot study of periodic analyses of blood from patients following intensive chemotherapy. When fever occurred, it was treated with empirical antibiotic therapy, basically without knowledge of the PCR results. In 23 febrile episodes during the neutropenic period, bacteria were detected by PCR in 11 cases, while the same species were identified by blood culture in 3 cases. In 10 out of 11 PCR-positive cases, fever could be managed by empirical therapy. In the empirical-therapy-resistant case, the identification of Stenotrophomonas maltophilia by PCR led to improvement of fever. No fungi were detected by PCR in febrile cases, while Aspergillus fumigatus was detected in one afebrile patient, several days before a clinical diagnosis was made. In subsequent sporadic PCR analyses in 15 cases of febrile neutropenia, bacteria were detected by both PCR and blood culture in 7 cases and by PCR alone in 6. Fungi were not detected. While fever was improved by empirical therapy in 12 out of the 13 PCR-positive cases, the identification of Pseudomonas aeruginosa by PCR in one therapy-resistant case contributed to the successful treatment of persistent fever. Our results indicate that PCR analysis of bacteria from blood provides essential information for managing empirical-therapy-resistant febrile neutropenia.Detection of Aspergillus DNA by a nested PCR assay is able to improve the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in paediatric patients.Fungal infections are a leading cause of morbidity and mortality in severely immunocompromised patients and have been increasing in incidence in recent years. Invasive aspergillosis (IA) is the most common filamentous fungal infection and is, in adults as well as in children, difficult to diagnose. Several PCR assays to detect Aspergillus DNA have been established, but so far, studies on molecular tools for the diagnosis of IA in children are few. We evaluated the results of a nested PCR assay to detect Aspergillus DNA in clinical samples from paediatric and adolescent patients with suspected IA. Blood and non-blood samples from immunocompromised paediatric and adolescent patients with suspected invasive fungal infection were sent for processing Aspergillus PCR to our laboratory. PCR results from consecutive patients from three university children's hospitals investigated between November 2000 and January 2007 were evaluated. Fungal infections were classified according to the EORTC classification on the grounds of clinical findings, microbiology and radio-imaging results. Two hundred and ninety-one samples from 71 patients were investigated for the presence of Aspergillus DNA by our previously described nested PCR assay. Two, 3 and 34 patients had proven, probable and possible IA, respectively. Sensitivity (calculated from proven and probable patients, n=5) and specificity (calculated from patients without IA, n=32) rates of the PCR assay were 80 and 81 %, respectively. Our nested PCR assay was able to detect Aspergillus DNA in blood, cerebrospinal fluid and bronchoalveolar lavage samples from paediatric and adolescent patients with IA with high sensitivity and specificity rates.Aspergillus PCR testing: results from a prospective PCR study within the AmBiLoad trial.Invasive fungal infection (IFI) is a major cause of morbidity and mortality in severely immunocompromised patients and is difficult to diagnose. The significance of molecular methods for diagnosis of IFI is still controversial. In a subset of patients treated within the AmBiLoad Trial, samples were investigated prospectively by a nested Aspergillus PCR assay to re-evaluate the significance of PCR in this setting.In the randomized, prospective multicenter AmBiLoad trial, patients with proven or probable IFI were randomized to receive liposomal amphotericin B (L-AMB) 3 or 10 mg/kg QD for 14 d followed by L-AMB 3 mg/kg QD. From 91 patients, 459 serial samples (98% blood samples) were investigated by a nested PCR assay for Aspergillus DNA. All samples were investigated in our laboratory with a previously described nested and a quantitative PCR assay. As required by the study protocol, serial Aspergillus antigen galactomannan was performed. IFI was defined according to modified EORTC/MSG 2002 criteria as applied in the AmBiLoad trial.Seven and 52 patients had proven and probable IFI according to modified EORTC/MSG criteria, respectively. The median number of samples investigated per patient was 4. Seventy percent of samples were obtained during treatment with antifungal study medication. Forty-three samples gave positive PCR results. Patients with an unfavorable outcome had a significantly higher rate of positive PCR results (48% versus 21%).The sensitivity of Aspergillus PCR testing is limited during antifungal therapy. The tendency for persistently positive PCR results to indicate a poor prognosis has to be confirmed in further studies.Study on invasive fungal infections in immunocompromised patients to present a suitable early diagnostic procedure.The incidence of invasive fungal infections has increased considerably in recent years. The aim of this study was to present a suitable early diagnostic procedure in immunocompromised patients, using a molecular assay.From September 2005 to January 2007, 310 immunosuppressed patients were followed for fungal infections for a 6-month period. EDTA-anticoagulant whole blood specimens were collected prospectively once per week and stored at -20 degrees C until use in molecular assays.Molecular assays were positive in 55 (17.7%) patients. The etiologic agents were Candida albicans (67.3%), Aspergillus flavus (20.0%), Aspergillus fumigatus (7.3%), Candida tropicalis (3.6%), and Candida krusei (1.8%). The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of PCR-ELISA with proven and probable invasive fungal infections were 84.6%, 92.7%, 75.3%, and 95.8%, respectively. The results showed that the mean clinical manifestation time was 38.96 days and the mean time of positivity of the molecular test (time of infection) was 17.69 days. A linear model for predicted infection and clinical manifestation time was found to be as follows: Y=11.64+1.147X, r(2)=0.812, where Y is the time at presentation of clinical signs and X is the time of infection (positive PCR-ELISA result).It may be concluded that the molecular assay would help in the diagnosis of invasive fungal infections at the early stage of infection, before clinical manifestations.Comparison of serum galactomannan antigen detection and competitive polymerase chain reaction for diagnosing invasive aspergillosis.To improve the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA), we retrospectively compared competitive polymerase chain reaction (PCR) and sandwich ELISA for detection of serum galactomannan (GM) antigen. We studied 281 serum samples collected weekly during the period at risk for IA from 41 selected hematology patients. Twenty-two patients had confirmed, probable, or suspected IA, according to clinical and mycologic data. Fifteen of them had positive GM titers (87 samples) and 12 had positive PCRs (20 samples). Nineteen of the 20 PCR-positive samples were also GM-positive. Of the 19 patients without IA (83 samples), one had 3 GM-false-positive samples. Neither test anticipated the initiation of antifungal therapy on the basis of clinical suspicion. Both tests were more likely to be positive before death. This study suggests that PCR on serum samples is not more sensitive than GM detection. However, PCR can improve the specificity of the GM test. Together, these noninvasive tests should improve the diagnosis of IA.Molecular detection and identification of Candida and Aspergillus spp. from clinical samples using real-time PCR.This report describes the development of a real-time LightCycler assay for the detection and identification of Candida and Aspergillus spp., using the MagNa Pure LC Instrument for automated extraction of fungal DNA. The assay takes 5-6 h to perform. The oligonucleotide primers and probes used for species identification were derived from the DNA sequences of the 18S rRNA genes of various fungal pathogens. All samples were screened for Aspergillus and Candida to the genus level in the real-time PCR assay. If a sample was Candida-positive, typing to species level was performed using five species-specific probes. The assay detected and identified most of the clinically relevant Aspergillus and Candida spp. with a sensitivity of 2 CFU/mL blood. Amplification was 100% specific for all Aspergillus and Candida spp. tested. To assess clinical applicability, 1,650 consecutive samples (1,330 blood samples, 295 samples from other body fluids and 25 biopsy samples) from patients with suspected invasive fungal infections were analysed. In total, 114 (6.9%) samples were PCR-positive, 5.3% for Candida and 1.7% for Aspergillus spp. In patients with positive PCR results for Candida and Aspergillus, verification with conventional methods was possible in 83% and 50% of cases, respectively. In conclusion, the real-time PCR assay allows sensitive and specific detection and identification of fungal pathogens in vitro and in vivo.Comparison of PCR-ELISA and galactomannan detection for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis.To compare PCR with galactomannan antigen detection for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA).We prospectively collected serial blood samples from haematological patients at risk of IA, and analysed their samples retrospectively for galactomannan (GM) antigen using the Platelia test and for aspergillus DNA using an in-house PCR-ELISA assay. Matched GM and PCR analyses were performed on 263 samples from 25 patients. Patients were classified for potential IA according to international consensus criteria, with five patients classified as positive (four proven, one probable) and 20 classified as negative (seven possible, 13 no evidence IA).All five patients with IA were positive by PCR with positive results in 24 of 82 samples, whereas three of five patients were positive by GM with four of 82 samples being positive. Three of 20 patients without IA were positive by PCR in 18 of 181 samples, whereas corresponding results for GM detection were one of 20 and one of 181, respectively. Adjustment of ELISA cut-off values and/or the requirement for two consecutive samples to be positive generated different results; however, lowering the positivity index (PI) for GM detection to 0.5 did not improve the sensitivity of the assay. Optimal results for PCR detection and GM were: 100% and 60% sensitivity, 85% and 95% specificity, 0.625 and 0.75 positive predictive value, and 1.0 and 0.8 negative predictive value, with a false-positive sample rate of 8 and 0.4%, positive likelihood ratio of 6.66 and 11.99 and negative likelihood ratio of 0 and 0.42, respectively.This PCR method is very sensitive for the diagnosis of IA but is associated with a moderate rate of false positives; the GM assay exhibited poor sensitivity but high specificity. Further evaluation of PCR assays for the diagnosis of IA and other invasive fungal infections is warranted.Clinical impact of enhanced diagnosis of invasive fungal disease in high-risk haematology and stem cell transplant patients.To investigate the impact of routine use of biomarkers for diagnosing fungal infection within a care pathway on antifungal usage and clinical outcomes.A cohort of high-risk haematology and stem cell transplant patients was entered into a neutropenic care pathway in which targeted diagnostic testing replaced empiric antifungal treatment. Patients were screened twice a week by PCR and antigen testing during fever or when chronic graft versus host disease was present and were followed-up for a minimum of 1 year.No excess morbidity or mortality was seen in patients in whom empiric antifungal treatment was withheld, and there were substantial savings in antifungal drug expenditure.The introduction of a comprehensive diagnostic surveillance strategy to exclude invasive fungal infection in high-risk patients with haematological malignancy and those undergoing transplantation can result in improvements in clinical management. There are also potential additional benefits of improved patient survival, decreased morbidity and decreased hospital stay.Use of real-time PCR on blood samples for diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis.We developed a new quantitative system for diagnosis of invasive pulmonary aspergillosis (IPA) using real-time automated polymerase chain reaction (PCR). Intra-assay and interassay precision rates for in vitro examination were 2.53% and 2.20%, respectively, and the linearity of this assay was obtained when there were >20 copies/well. We examined 323 samples taken from 122 patients with hematological malignancies, including 33 patients with IPA and 89 control patients. Blood samples were subjected to PCR antigen detection methods, using enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) and determination of plasma (1-->3)-beta-D-glucan (BDG) concentration. The sensitivities of PCR, ELISA, and BDG measurement for diagnosis of IPA were 79%, 58%, and 67%, respectively; the specificities were 92%, 97%, and 84%. Positive findings on PCR preceded those of computed tomography by -0.3+/-6.6 days, those of BDG measurement by 6.5+/-4.9 days, and those of ELISA by 2.8+/-4.1 days. Real-time PCR was sensitive for IPA diagnosis, and quantitation was accurate.The evolution and evaluation of a whole blood polymerase chain reaction assay for the detection of invasive aspergillosis in hematology patients in a routine clinical setting.Invasive aspergillosis (IA) is associated with high mortality. Successful outcome with treatment is linked to early diagnosis. The utility of classic diagnostic methods, however, is limited.To aid in the diagnosis of IA, we retrospectively assessed our diagnostic service, using real-time polymerase chain reaction (PCR) and galactomannan sandwich enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA).A total of 203 patients at risk of invasive fungal infection were screened by PCR, and 116 of the patients were also tested by ELISA. The patient group comprised 176 patients with hematological malignancy and 28 control patients with evidence of invasive candidal infection. Consensus European Organisation for Research and Treatment of Cancer and Mycoses Study Group criteria were used to classify fungal infection, which, by definition, excluded the PCR result. The PCR method was sensitive (up to 92.3% sensitivity) and specific (up to 94.6% specificity) and had good agreement with the galactomannan ELISA (76.7%) and high-resolution computed tomography scan results.A negative PCR result can be used to rule out IA and to limit the need for empirical antifungal therapy; thus, it has a role in diagnosing IA infections, especially in combination with antigen testing. PCR-positive cases classified as "false positives" regularly reflect the limitations of classic microbiological procedures or restricted use of consensus clinical methods employed to classify infection.Ribosomal and mitochondrial DNA target for real-time PCR diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis.The aim of the present study was to assess the diagnostic efficacy of a combination of two quantitative Aspergillus PCR assays, targeting a mitochondrial and a ribosomal target, in patients with risk factors for invasive aspergillosis (IA) and positive galactomannan (GM) antigen. Forty-four patients with hematological malignancies and risk factors for IA according to revised European Organization for Research on Treatment of Cancer and the Mycoses Study Group criteria (EORTC/MSG) criteria and presenting at least two sequential GM-positive sera were included in the study. Mitochondrial PCR was carried out prospectively on all GM-positive serum samples. Ribosomal PCR was carried out retrospectively on frozen stored sera. The sensitivities of mitochondrial and ribosomal PCRs were 58% and 50%, respectively. The diagnostic test performance was improved by using a combination of both PCR assays and by considering a patient PCR positive when at least two positive results were obtained. The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative likelihood ratios were 65%, 94%, and 11.8 and 0.37, respectively. A significant association between fatal outcome at 90 days and positive results of ribosomal PCR assays was observed (adjusted hazard ratio = 8.2; 95% confidence interval [CI] = 1.0 to 65.8; P = 0.048). Our results showed that the combination of two PCR assays targeting mitochondrial and ribosomal Aspergillus DNA improves the sensitivity of PCR in the diagnosis of IA in hematological patients with risk factors and positive GM results. This study also confirms that a positive PCR result is associated with a poor prognosis in these patients and should lead to specific antifungal therapy being introduced immediately.[Detection of Aspergillus infection in blood of malignant hematopoietic tumor patients by two-step polymerase chain reaction].To investigate the sensitivity and specificity of two-step PCR in detection of Aspergillus species in blood from malignant hematopoietic tumor patients.Forty-one blood samples from high-risk patients were detected with two-step PCR. The clinical applicability was assessed with analyzing computed tomography, Aspergillus culture, neutropenia and outcome after anti-fungal therapy.Specific band of PCR was obtained from Aspergillus strains and products of PCR had a high homogeneous in sequence with Aspergillus species. Sixteen of 41 patients were PCR positive and controls were all PCR negative. Among PCR positive patients, 4 patients had positive cultures. The lowest WBC count was (0.30 +/- 0.14) x 10(9)/L and (0.50 +/- 0.26) x 10(9)/L respectively and duration with WBC count less than 1.0 x 10(9)/L was (19.00 +/- 8.31) days and (12.69 +/- 6.95) days respectively in the two groups. After antifungal therapy, one of the patients with PCR positive died of chemotherapy-related early death.The two-step PCR assay allows for highly sensitive and specific detection of Aspergillus pathogens in vitro and in vivo. The detection with PCR has some value in the early diagnosis and helps us to make decision for antifungal therapy.Molecular detection and identification of Aspergillus spp. from clinical samples using real-time PCR.The definite and rapid diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis is necessary because of the high mortality caused. The objective of this study was to evaluate a real-time PCR assay to detect Aspergillus spp. in clinical samples, based on the Light Cycler technology. Specificity was assessed by using DNA extracted from pathogenic and non-pathogenic bacteria/fungi from Spanish Collection including: two Aspergillus flavus, four Aspergillus fumigatus, two Aspergillus nidulans, two Aspergillus niger and two Aspergillus terreus isolates. The analytical sensitivity was evaluated with different inocula (10(1)-10(5) conidia ml(-1)), and serially diluted DNA of A. fumigatus. To assess clinical applicability, samples from patients at risk were analysed. Species identification was determined by analysing the melting curves. Reactions using genomic DNA from other species of different genera than Aspergillus were negative (specificity: 100%). Analytical sensitivity was 60 fg using DNA and 5-20 conidia using conidial suspensions. The linear range was from 60 to 6 x 10(7) fg. The Tm ranged from 67.34 to 70.7 degrees C for the different Aspergillus spp. studied. Nine hundred and forty-eight consecutive blood samples from 127 patients were processed. In total, 10 (1%) of 948 samples from blood samples were PCR-positive. The real-time PCR assay provides a high sensitivity and specificity for detection of fungal DNA and rapidly identifies most of clinically relevant Aspergillus species.Combined real-time PCR and galactomannan surveillance improves diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in high risk patients with haematological malignancies.Invasive aspergillosis (IA) is a leading complication of intensive treatment for haematological malignancies. Earlier diagnosis should facilitate effective antifungal therapy and prevent progression to invasive disease, which is often lethal. Polymerase chain reaction (PCR) assays, targeting the 28S and ITS ribosomal gene regions respectively, were evaluated for early detection of Aspergillus DNA and for diagnostic utility in patients receiving treatment in two busy haematopoietic stem cell transplant centres. Patients undergoing intensive chemotherapy, autologous or allogeneic transplant were eligible for inclusion in the study. EDTA blood and serum samples for circulating Aspergillus biomarkers, including galactomannan (GM), were collected twice-weekly on a prospective basis from all study patients who were categorized according to international consensus criteria for defining invasive fungal disease (IFD). Of 278 patients recruited there were 44 probable IA cases and only one proven case. Moderate sensitivity and specificity, poor positive predictive value (50-80%), but good negative predictive value (>80-90%) were common to both PCR assays. Overall biomarker performance could be improved by combining positive results of either PCR assay with GM taken within a 12-d period. The addition of PCR to GM monitoring in high-risk patients with haematological malignancies provides greater diagnostic accuracy in invasive aspergillosis.PCR-ELISA for the early diagnosis of invasive pulmonary aspergillus infection in neutropenic patients.To evaluate a newly developed aspergillus mitochondrial gene PCR-ELISA assay for the early diagnosis of invasive pulmonary aspergillosis (IPA) in neutropenic patients.The aspergillus mitochondrial gene was chosen for the amplification target for use with a solution hybridisation assay with colorimetric end stage detection in microtitre plate format (PCR-ELISA). The study group comprised neutropenic patients undergoing febrile episodes not responding to standard antibacterial antibiotics. Patients underwent computed tomography and bronchoscopy. Bronchoalveolar lavage (BAL) fluids were examined by culture and PCR.The aspergillus mitochondrial gene PCR-ELISA was both sensitive (100%) and specific (100%) for IPA in neutropenic patients. All 12 patients with definite or probable IPA had PCR positive BAL fluids. None of the patients with undiagnosed or confirmed infections of other aetiologies were mitochondrial PCR positive. Speciation based upon amplicon size difference was possible.Aspergillus mitochondrial DNA PCR-ELISA on BAL fluid is useful in the early diagnosis of IPA in neutropenic patients alone or, potentially, as an indication for thoracic computed tomography.Assessment of the lightcycler PCR assay for diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in paediatric patients with onco-haematological diseases.A reliable diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) is hampered by the difficulty in obtaining suitable tissue samples. To evaluate the sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value (PPV) and negative predictive value (NPV) of the LightCycler PCR for the diagnosis of IA, 536 blood samples were collected over a 22-month period from 62 paediatric patients (median age 10 years, range 1-18) considered at risk of IA. The galactomannan antigen (GM) and fungal DNA were assessed on serial blood samples. IA was diagnosed in eight of 62 patients (13%): proven, five, probable, three. Sensitivity, specificity, PPV and NPV of LightCycler PCR varied according to the number of positive samples used to define positivity: 88%; 37%; 17% and 95% for single sample positivity; and 63%, 81%, 33% and 94% for serial sample positivity respectively. The concordance between positivity of LightCycler PCR assay and the diagnosis of IA was 79%. The single positivity of LightCycler PCR assay showed a good sensitivity for the diagnosis of IA in paediatric patients. The high NPV makes LightCycler PCR a promising tool in addition to GM testing to design a strategy of pre-emptive antifungal therapy, although further validation studies are needed.Establishment and application of real-time quantitative PCR for diagnosing invasive aspergillosis via the blood in hematological patients: targeting a specific sequence of Aspergillus 28S-ITS2.Invasive aspergillosis (IA) is an important cause of morbidity and mortality in immunocompromised individuals. This study was conducted to identify a desirable target DNA sequence for the diagnosis of aspergillosis using real-time quantitative polymerase chain reaction (qPCR).Genomic DNA was extracted from Aspergillus, Candida, and bacteria species, and qPCR was applied to validate a partial ribosomal DNA 28S-ITS2 sequence. Ethylenediaminetetraacetic acid-anticoagulated blood samples were collected from 72 febrile hematological patients, while total DNA was isolated from plasma and whole blood for the Aspergillus qPCR. The results were analyzed using a receiver operating characteristic curve. All cases were evaluated using the revised European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer/Invasive Fungal Infections Cooperative Group and the National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases Mycoses Study Group (EORTC/MSG) diagnostic criteria.Use of qPCR yielded positive results for 15 Aspergillus species but negative results for Candida species, bacterial strains, and human DNA. The limit of detection was one copy per microliter of DNA. Analytical sensitivity and specificity were six copies of DNA and 100%, respectively. The standard curve showed that qPCR was reliable for Aspergillus detection and that significantly more DNA copies were obtained from whole blood than from plasma (P < 0.001). At a cut-off value ≥ 25 copies/μL, the diagnostic sensitivity and specificity for IA using 28S-ITS2 qPCR were 90.9% and 73.4%, respectively.The use of qPCR with whole blood to detect and verify the 28S-ITS2 sequence is a specific and useful way to diagnose IA.Evaluation of pan-fungal PCR assay and Aspergillus antigen detection in the diagnosis of invasive fungal infections in high risk paediatric cancer patients.Profound and prolonged neutropenia following chemotherapy is a major risk factor for systemic fungal infection. As the early diagnosis of invasive fungal infection (IFI) is difficult, these infections are still associated with high morbidity and mortality. Recently, Pan-fungal polymerase chain reaction (PCR) has been a promising aid in rapid, early diagnosis of IFI. During the past few years, increasing numbers of suspected IFIs were encountered at our institution in patients with prolonged neutropenia after intensified immunosuppressive chemotherapy. The aim of this study was to investigate the diagnostic utility of both the aspergillus galactomannan (GM) antigen and the pan-fungal PCR assay in the diagnosis of IFI in high risk febrile neutropenic paediatric cancer patients. During one year period, 91 febrile neutropenic (FN) paediatric cases at high risk for developing IFI while receiving chemotherapy were investigated at National Cancer Institute, Egypt. These patients were subjected to clinical evaluation, chest CT scan, conventional blood cultures for bacterial and fungal pathogens, aspergillus GM antigen detection and PCR assay utilizing pan-fungal primers. Of the 91 FN episodes, 15 were proven IFI; whereas 27 cases were either probable (n=13) or possible IFI (n=14), and 49 were unlikely to be IFI episodes. Based on positive results for proven/probable IFI and compared to culture results, Pan-fungal PCR showed sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values of 75%, 92%, 84% and 87%; respectively. Aspergillus antigen test showed a sensitivity of 79%, specificity of 61%, positive and negative predictive values of 54% and 83%; respectively. A negative PCR in the proven and probable cases was closely related to previous antifungal therapy for a prior history of IFI. In patients at high risk for IFI, neither the sensitivity, nor specificity of the GM test was sufficient. The results of PCR assay was reasonably specific but not very sensitive and had a chance of missing the diagnosis of IFI. The PCR assay seems a promising test for objectively defining IFI, but is not recommended as the only tool for diagnosing IFI. Combining microscopy, culture, and PCR may improve the diagnostic outcome.Clinical utility of a panfungal polymerase chain reaction assay for invasive fungal diseases in patients with haematologic disorders.Invasive fungal diseases (IFDs) are life-threatening events in patients with haematologic disorders, and the spectrum of the aetiological pathogens continues to expand. This study aimed to evaluate the clinical utility of a panfungal polymerase chain reaction (PCR) assay for the management of IFDs in such patients.We prospectively analysed 273 consecutive blood samples from 64 risk episodes in 51 patients with haematologic disorders at high risk for IFD who were treated at our hospital between April 2007 and October 2010.PCR-positive results were obtained in 18 of 64 risk episodes (35.3%). IFD was documented in 14 episodes (21.9%, 9 probable IFDs and 5 possible IFDs) according to the revised criteria of the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer/Mycoses Study Group. PCR was positive in all of these 14 episodes, and in 4 of the 50 episodes with no IFD category. Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value of our assay were 100%, 92%, 78% and 100% respectively. A considerable number of fungi (44.4%) that are less common than Aspergillus and Candida species were positive by PCR. Molecular diagnoses of Cunninghamella species, Aspergillus ustus, Fusarium species, Scedosporium apiospermum, Rhodotorula species and Rhizopus species were beneficial in selecting suitable treatments.Our panfungal PCR approach allows for the highly sensitive and specific detection and identification of a wide spectrum of fungal pathogens, which provides indispensable information for managing IFDs, especially refractory or breakthrough IFDs during antifungal therapy in high-risk patients with haematologic disorders.Prospective evaluation of a polymerase chain reaction-ELISA targeted to Aspergillus fumigatus and Aspergillus flavus for the early diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in patients with hematological malignancies.Current laboratory and radiological methods for diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) lack sensitivity and specificity.We prospectively evaluated the diagnostic value of twice-weekly screening for circulating Aspergillus fumigatus and A. flavus DNA with a polymerase chain reaction-enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (PCR-ELISA).Among the 201 adult patients with hematological malignancies who were included in the study, 55 IA cases were diagnosed. On the basis of the analysis of 1205 serum samples from 167 patients, the sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of the PCR-ELISA for proven and probable IA cases were 63.6%, 89.7%, 63.6%, and 89.7%, respectively, when samples with 2 consecutive positive results were used. The use of a combination of the PCR-ELISA and a galactomannan (GM) assay increased the sensitivity to 83.3%, increased the negative predictive value to 97.6%, and decreased the specificity to 69.8%. In most patients with IA, PCR-ELISA positivity anticipated or was simultaneous with the initiation of antifungal therapy, the abnormalities found by computed tomography, the mycological/histological diagnosis, and the GM positivity. Overall, 56.3% of the patients had at least 1 positive sample, and the false single-positive rate was 44.8%.In addition to serial screening for GM antigenemia and radiological surveillance, PCR-ELISA may improve the rates of early diagnosis of IA and the management of patients with hematological malignancies.Utility of a commercially available multiplex real-time PCR assay to detect bacterial and fungal pathogens in febrile neutropenia.Infection is the main treatment-related cause of mortality in cancer patients. Rapid and accurate diagnosis to facilitate specific therapy of febrile neutropenia is therefore urgently warranted. Here, we evaluated a commercial PCR-based kit to detect the DNA of 20 different pathogens (SeptiFast) in the setting of febrile neutropenia after chemotherapy. Seven hundred eighty-four serum samples of 119 febrile neutropenic episodes (FNEs) in 70 patients with hematological malignancies were analyzed and compared with clinical, microbiological, and biochemical findings. In the antibiotic-naïve setting, bacteremia was diagnosed in 34 FNEs and 11 of them yielded the same result in the PCR. Seventy-three FNEs were negative in both systems, leading to an overall agreement in 84 of 119 FNEs (71%). During antibiotic therapy, positivity in blood culture occurred only in 3% of cases, but the PCR yielded a positive result in 15% of cases. In six cases the PCR during antibiotic treatment detected a new pathogen repetitively; this was accompanied by a significant rise in procalcitonin levels, suggestive of a true detection of infection. All patients with probable invasive fungal infection (IFI; n = 3) according to the standards of the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer had a positive PCR result for Aspergillus fumigatus; in contrast there was only one positive result for Aspergillus fumigatus in an episode without signs and symptoms of IFI. Our results demonstrate that the SeptiFast kit cannot replace blood cultures in the diagnostic workup of FNEs. However, it might be helpful in situations where blood cultures remain negative (e.g., during antimicrobial therapy or in IFI).Pathogen-specific DNA enrichment does not increase sensitivity of PCR for diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in neutropenic patients.PCR assays designed for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) in high-risk patients have to detect minute amounts of target DNA to reach sufficient analytical sensitivity to be of clinical use. This prospective study assessed the use of a novel strategy for selective pathogen DNA enrichment for enhancing the performance of diagnostic PCR in a direct comparison with a highly sensitive in-house quantitative PCR (qPCR) assay and the galactomannan enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA). Surprisingly, and in contrast to experience with other patient groups, the novel protocol for selective pathogen DNA enrichment did not enhance but instead significantly impaired sensitivity. This could be explained by the small amounts of host DNA in the specimens, which were derived mostly from severely neutropenic patients. In the qPCR assay, positive samples required an average of 43.5 amplification cycles (range, 39.2 to 50) for detection in the in-house PCR. Repetitive testing of selected samples showed test positivity to be variable, most likely due to the small amounts of target DNA. Despite this, the in-house protocol proved helpful in the diagnosis of IA, detecting 2 out of 3 patients with probable IA and 10 out of 19 patients with possible IA. Our results underline the necessity for diagnostic PCR protocols that help diagnose IA to be highly sensitive and show that selective pathogen DNA enrichment using affinity purification may not be useful in severely neutropenic patients.Detection of Aspergillus spp. in biological samples by real-time PCR.Recently, the proportion of invasive infections caused by the filamentous fungi of the Aspergillus genus are growing in immunocompromised persons particularly in transplant recipients and neutropenic patients. Unfortunately, laboratory diagnostics of invasive aspergillosis remains extremely difficult, mainly with regard to the sensitivity of the methods and to the correct interpretation of the results in particular.The aim of this work was to design a standard and reproducible Aspergillus DNA detection method and its validation. The second aim was to practically use this method for diagnosis of Aspergillus DNA in various samples in patients.Real-time PCR with two hybridization probes. Amplification and on-line quantification was carried out on a LightCycler 1.5 Instrument.Specificity of the reaction was tested for A. fumigatus, A. flavus, A. niger and A. terreus, and its sensitivity was determined at 5 copies per ml. The reproducibility of the results was comparable to other methods, reported in the literature. Applicability of the real-time PCR was assessed for detection of Aspergillus DNA in 354 various clinical samples taken from 179 patients at risk of invasive aspergillosis over the period of 33 months. Of 354 samples 103 (29.10 %) taken from 65 patients (36.31 %) were evaluated as positive. Over one year, the percentage of positive samples was mostly about 30 % or less per month.Our results demonstrate the high sensitivity, specificity and reproducibility of this technique, and its usefulness for rapid laboratory diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis.Role of prospective screening of blood for invasive aspergillosis by polymerase chain reaction in febrile neutropenic recipients of haematopoietic stem cell transplants and patients with acute leukaemia.Guidelines for the use of polymerase chain reaction (PCR)-based assays to aid the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) in high-risk haematology patients have not been formulated. We prospectively evaluated a nested PCR assay to detect Aspergillus in blood during 95 febrile neutropenic episodes, in patients with haematological malignancy and haematopoietic stem cell transplant (HSCT) recipients. PCR results were correlated with the diagnostic classification of the 2002 European Organisation for Research and Treatment of Cancer/Mycosis Study Group. When two-positive results were used to define an episode as 'PCR positive', the sensitivity, specificity, positive-predictive value and negative predictive value for 'proven'/'probable' IA (n = 13) were 100%, 75.4%, 46.4% and 100%, respectively. Consecutive positive results occurred in 61.5% of these 13 episodes. Overall, PCR positivity preceded standard diagnosis by a mean of 14 d and the median time between positive results was shorter than that in other categories of IA. All 13 episodes occurred in the setting of allogeneic HSCT recipients and acute leukaemia. If 'eligibility' for antifungal therapy were based on two-positive-PCR tests, use of empiric treatment could have been reduced by up to 37%. The nested PCR assay is a practical screening test for excluding IA. Patients with consecutive positive results or intermittent-positive results (within 14 d) warrant immediate investigations for IA and the initiation of antifungal therapy.Detection of circulating Aspergillus fumigatus DNA by real-time PCR assay of large serum volumes improves early diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in high-risk adult patients under hematologic surveillance.Detection of galactomannan antigen (GMA) in serum is the standard assay for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) in high-risk patients with hematological disorders. Detection of Aspergillus DNA in serum has been proposed, but its sensitivity is lower than that of GMA when small serum volumes (SSV) are used. In this study, we investigated whether extraction of DNA from large serum volumes (LSV) improves diagnostic yield. In a 13-month prospective study, we compared the performances of twice-weekly screening of serum for GMA by an enzyme immunoassay and weekly screening for Aspergillus fumigatus DNA by a real-time PCR (RT-PCR) assay of 1.0 ml (LSV) or 100 mul (SSV) of serum. We included 124 patients (138 treatment episodes), with 17 episodes of EORTC (European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer)/MSG (Mycoses Study Group)-documented IA. In all, 1,870 samples were screened for GMA. The sensitivity (Se), specificity (Sp), and positive and negative predictive values (PPV and NPV, respectively) of GMA for IA were 88.2%, 95.8%, 75%, and 98.3%, respectively. We screened 938 samples for Aspergillus DNA by using LSV; 404 of these samples were also tested with SSV. The Se, Sp, PPV, and NPV of RT-PCR were 100%, 96.7%, 81%, and 100%, respectively, with LSV and 76.5%, 96.7%, 81.3%, and 95.6%, respectively, with SSV. DNA detection gave a positive result when performed on LSV in two cases of IA where the GMA assay result remained negative. Furthermore, in four IA cases, DNA was detected earlier than GMA. The use of LSV for extraction improved the performance of the RT-PCR, which appears highly sensitive and specific for the early diagnosis of IA in high-risk patients with hematological disorders.Monochrome LightCycler PCR assay for detection and quantification of five common species of Candida and Aspergillus.Invasive fungal pathogens, especially in immunocompromised hosts, can result in life-threatening infections. Current laboratory/radiological methods for fungal identification are time-consuming and lack sensitivity and specificity. A monochrome, multiplex, real-time PCR assay for the identification and quantification of Candida albicans, Candida krusei, Candida tropicalis, Aspergillus flavus and Aspergillus fumigatus is described here. Detection of each of these fungi was specific and demonstrated 100 % concordance with biochemical/culture identification in all 60 isolates tested. Samples from 16 febrile neutropenic patients with haematological malignancies were also analysed and the utility of the assay in clinical samples was reconfirmed without false-negative results. The sensitivity of this assay was 0.1 pg fungal genomic DNA, corresponding to three cells, for C. albicans, C. krusei, C. tropicalis and A. flavus, and 0.01 pg fungal genomic DNA, i.e. less than one cell, for A. fumigatus. The analysis allows a low-cost, simple, rapid and sensitive alternative for clinical identification and quantification of these five common fungal species.Prospective comparison of the diagnostic potential of real-time PCR, double-sandwich enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay for galactomannan, and a (1-->3)-beta-D-glucan test in weekly screening for invasive aspergillosis in patients with hematological disorders.The establishment of an optimal noninvasive method for diagnosing invasive aspergillosis (IA) is needed to improve the management of this life-threatening infection in patients with hematological disorders, and a number of noninvasive tests for IA that target different fungal components, including galactomannan, (1-->3)-beta-d-glucan (BDG), and Aspergillus DNA, have been developed. In this study, we prospectively evaluated the diagnostic potential of three noninvasive tests for IA that were used in a weekly screening strategy: the double-sandwich enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) for galactomannan (Platelia Aspergillus), a real-time PCR assay for Aspergillus DNA (GeniQ-Asper), and an assay for BDG (beta-glucan Wako). We analyzed 149 consecutive treatment episodes in 96 patients with hematological disorders who were at high risk for IA and diagnosed 9 proven IA cases, 2 probable IA cases, and 13 possible invasive fugal infections. In a receiver-operating characteristic (ROC) analysis, the area under the ROC curve was greatest for ELISA, using two consecutive positive results (0.97; P = 0.036 for ELISA versus PCR, P = 0.055 for ELISA versus BDG). Based on the ROC curve, the cutoff for the ELISA could be reduced to an optical density index (O.D.I.) of 0.6. With the use of this cutoff for ELISA and cutoffs for PCR and BDG that give a comparable level of specificity, the sensitivity/specificity/positive predictive value/negative predictive value of the ELISA and the PCR and BDG tests were 1.00/0.93/0.55/1.00, 0.55/0.93/0.40/0.96, and 0.55/0.93/0.40/0.96, respectively. In conclusion, among these weekly screening tests for IA, the double-sandwich ELISA test was the most sensitive at predicting the diagnosis of IA in high-risk patients with hematological disorders, using a reduced cutoff of 0.6 O.D.I.Multicenter comparison of serum and whole-blood specimens for detection of Aspergillus DNA in high-risk hematological patients.Samples from patients at high risk for invasive aspergillosis (IA) were prospectively collected and analyzed for the presence of molecular markers of fungal infection. Serum specimens were screened for galactomannan and Aspergillus DNA, and whole-blood specimens were screened only for Aspergillus DNA. Fungal infections were categorized according to the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer/Invasive Fungal Infections Cooperative Group, National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases Mycoses Study Group (EORTC/MSG) criteria. Forty-seven cases (proven and probable IA) and 31 controls (no evidence of IA) were selected retrospectively for this case-control study, comprising 803 samples, in order to determine the performance of whole-blood PCR, serum PCR, and serum galactomannan testing. Although no single assay was able to detect every case of IA, a combination of different assays provided the best performance. There was no significant difference between the use of whole-blood and serum specimens for PCR-based diagnosis of IA, but there was a trend for whole blood to be more sensitive (85% versus 79%) and to yield an earlier positive result (36 days versus 15 days) than for serum. However, DNA extraction from serum specimens is easier and faster than that from whole-blood specimens, and it allows the same specimen to be used for both galactomannan and PCR assays. In conclusion, the appropriate sample type for DNA extraction should be determined by the local requirements and the technical platforms available at each individual center. A combination of biomarker tests offered the best diagnostic utility for detecting IA.Application of nucleic acid sequence-based amplification for diagnosis of and monitoring the clinical course of invasive aspergillosis in patients with hematologic diseases.We evaluated nucleic acid sequence-based amplification (NASBA) and a galactomannan enzyme immunosorbent assay (GM-EIA) for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) in neutropenic febrile patients and for monitoring of its clinical course and outcome. Blood samples were collected twice per week from 128 patients with hematologic diseases during periods of neutropenic fever after undergoing chemotherapy or hematopoietic stem cell transplantation. A total of 448 blood samples were tested.There were 14 patients with IA (2 patients with proven IA and 12 with probable IA). The median index of the initial NASBA in the IA group was more than 10-fold higher than that in the non-IA group. Galactomannan antigenemia (index, >0.5) was detected with a sensitivity of 86%. In receiver-operator characteristic analysis, the cutoff index of NASBA for the presumptive diagnosis of IA was determined to be 5.0. Combination of these 2 parameters (either a GM-EIA index of >or=0.5 or a NASBA index of >or=5.0) improved the sensitivity of diagnosis to 100%. There was a close relationship between patient outcome and the kinetics of NASBA values: failure of negative conversion during treatment resulted in death in almost all cases.If either GM-EIA or NASBA results suggest IA, the diagnostic yield for IA could be improved, and NASBA could be a useful marker for predicting the clinical course and outcome of treatment.Analysis of performance of a PCR-based assay to detect DNA of Aspergillus fumigatus in whole blood and serum: a comparative study with clinical samples.The performance of a real-time PCR-based assay was retrospectively analyzed (according to European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer/Mycosis Study Group criteria) in the samples of patients with invasive aspergillosis. A total of 711 serial samples (356 whole-blood and 355 serum samples) from 38 adult patients were analyzed. The Aspergillus fumigatus PCR assay results were positive for 89 of 356 (25%) whole-blood samples and 90 of 355 (25.35%) serum samples. Positive PCR results were seen in 29 of 31 (93.5%) patients for which serum was analyzed and in 31 of 33 (93.9%) cases with whole-blood specimens. Both blood and serum samples were available in 26 cases, and significant differences were not observed in this subgroup of cases. The average number of threshold cycles (C(T)) for positive blood samples was 37.6, and the average C(T) for serum was 37.4. The DNA concentration ranged between 2 and 50 fg per μl of sample, with average DNA concentrations of 10.2 and 11.7 fg in positive blood and serum samples, respectively (P > 0.01). The performance of this PCR-based quantitative assay was similar for both serum and blood samples. We recommend serum samples as the most convenient hematological sample to use for Aspergillus DNA quantification when serial determinations are done.Value of serial quantification of fungal DNA by a real-time PCR-based technique for early diagnosis of invasive Aspergillosis in patients with febrile neutropenia.A study was designed to assess the reliability of the serial detection of Aspergillus sp. DNA to diagnose invasive aspergillosis (IA) in patients with febrile neutropenia. Two blood and two serum samples were taken weekly from 83 patients. A total of 2,244 samples were analyzed by real-time quantitative PCR. Twelve (14.4%) patients were diagnosed with IA. Taking two consecutive positive results as the diagnostic criterion, PCR detected 11 cases, with 4 false positives, giving sensitivity, specificity, positive, and negative predictive values of 91.6%, 94.4%, 73.3%, and 98.5%, respectively. On analyzing in conjunction with high-resolution chest tomography (HRCT) and galactomannan (GM) testing, the combination of serial PCR and GM detected 100% of aspergillosis cases, with a positive predictive value of 75.1%. This diagnostic strategy presented, according to CART analysis, a receiver-operator curve with an area under the curve of 0.97 (95% confidence interval, 0.895 to 1.032; P < 0.01), with a relative risk of IA 6.92 times higher than the control population and with predictive success of 95.2%. As regards early diagnosis, the serial detection of Aspergillus DNA took on average 21 days less than HRCT and 68 days less than GM. The serial detection of Aspergillus DNA using real-time quantitative PCR has great diagnostic applicability, which increases when combined with GM quantification.Screening for Aspergillus spp. using polymerase chain reaction of whole blood samples from patients with haematological malignancies.Sensitive screening for Aspergillus spp. using polymerase chain reaction (PCR) of whole blood samples in patients with haematological disorders has not been performed to date. In a 2-year study, 121 patients admitted to the University Hospital of Innsbruck for cancer chemotherapy without clinical signs of fungal infection were prospectively screened for Aspergillus spp. In 28 out of 121 (23%) patients, Aspergillus DNAaemia was detected. Of these patients, 16 (57%) were positive only once for Aspergillus DNA, but positivity was never associated with invasive aspergillosis. PCR positive episodes were short and resolved without antifungal treatment. Five patients (18%) had intermittent PCR positive results. Seven (25%) patients presented at least two consecutive positive PCR results; one of these patients developed invasive aspergillosis and another two were strongly suspected as having aspergillosis. Based on the criteria of the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer case definitions, sensitivity and specificity of serial PCR monitoring were 75% and 96%. Positive PCR results became negative shortly after commencement of antifungal treatment, but the changes did not correlate with clinical responsiveness to treatment in three patients. Our results indicate the potential usefulness of PCR for screening for Aspergillus spp. in patients at risk, but without antifungal treatment.Detection of Aspergillus species in blood and bronchoalveolar lavage samples from immunocompromised patients by means of 2-step polymerase chain reaction: clinical results.Bronchoalveolar lavage (BAL) samples from 67 patients who were at high risk for invasive aspergillosis were examined using a recently developed 2-step polymerase chain reaction (PCR) that detects </=10 fg of Aspergillus DNA in blood and BAL samples in vitro. Thirteen of these patients had PCR and diagnostic results positive for Aspergillus infection. Four patients with possible invasive aspergillosis also had positive PCR results, and the remaining 50 had negative PCR results. In addition, 907 blood samples from 218 high-risk patients were screened. Thirty-three patients with positive PCR results had invasive aspergillosis; 148 patients had PCR and diagnostic results that were negative, and 34 patients with positive PCR results had nonconclusive clinical data. Both blood and BAL testing were performed for 45 patients. All 8 patients with proven invasive aspergillosis showed concordance of positive PCR results. Our data suggest that this PCR method has possible clinical value for confirming and improving the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in high-risk patients.Early detection of aspergillus infection after allogeneic stem cell transplantation by polymerase chain reaction screening.Invasive aspergillosis (IA) has become a major cause of mortality in patients after allogeneic stem cell transplantation. To assess the potential of prospective polymerase chain reaction (PCR) screening for early diagnosis of IA, 84 recipients of an allogeneic stem cell transplant were analyzed with the investigators blinded to clinical and microbiologic data. Of 1193 blood samples analyzed, 169 (14.2%) were positive by PCR. In patients with newly diagnosed IA (n=7), PCR positivity preceded the first clinical signs by a median of 2 days (range, 1-23 days) and preceded clinical diagnosis of IA by a median of 9 days (range, 2-34 days). Pretransplantation IA (relative risk [RR], 2.37), acute graft-versus-host disease (RR, 2.75), and corticosteroid treatment (RR, 6.5) were associated with PCR positivity. The PCR assay revealed a sensitivity of 100% (95% confidence interval [CI], 48%-100%) and a specificity of 65% (95% CI, 53%-75%). None of the PCR-negative patients developed IA during the study period. Thus, prospective PCR screening allows for identification of patients at high risk for subsequent onset of IA.Detection of Aspergillus species in bone marrow transplant patients.Invasive aspergillosis is a severe complication of cytotoxic chemotherapies and bone marrow transplantation (BMT). The aim of this study was to assess the utility of a real-time PCR assay for the early diagnosis of Aspergillus species in blood samples from BMT patients.Blood specimens (n = 993) from patients (n = 82) scheduled for BMT were collected prior to transplant and for 100 days post transplantation. The specimens were later tested using an Aspergillus-specific real-time PCR assay. Cultures of clinical samples, along with sonography and computerized tomographic scans, were performed as standard of care.Aspergillus DNA was positive in 94 sequential blood samples from 13 patients with clinical and radiological signs of infection. Samples from three of these patients were PCR-positive for Aspergillus in the first week of admission, prior to transplantation. Four patients with aspergillosis were cured with antifungal agents and nine died. An additional 12 patients without clinical signs of infection were PCR-positive on one occasion each, while two patients with clinical signs of infection were PCR-negative. Compared to routine methods of aspergillosis diagnosis, the respective sensitivity, specificity, negative, and positive predictive values of the PCR method by patient were 86.6%, 82%, 96.5% and 52%.The results show that Aspergillus infections in the blood of bone marrow transplant patients can be dectected by PCR methods. Early detection of Aspergillus infections by PCR has the potential to positively impact patient mortality rate and provide cost savings to hospitals.Molecular detection of invasive aspergillosis in hematologic malignancies.Aspergillus species are the most frequent causes of invasive mold infections in immunocompromised patients, particularly those who underwent chemotherapy for hematologic malignancies. The aim of this study was to determine the incidence and efficiency of the PCR-enzyme linked immunosorbent assay method (PCR-ELISA) for early detection of Aspergillus species in patients with hematologic malignancies.From 2004 to 2006, 194 patients with hematologic malignancies (who received chemotherapy) were evaluated for invasive aspergillosis (IA) in Shiraz, southern Iran. Ethylenediaminetetraacetic acid anticoagulant whole blood samples were collected prospectively once a week and stored at -20 degrees C until examination. All collected blood samples were assayed for the presence of the bands on ethidium bromide stained gel and for hybridization.The female-to-male ratio was 61:133, the mean age of patients was 33.7 years, and mean of hospitalization period was 21.2 days. PCR-ELISA was positive in 14 (7.2%) patients who exhibited clinical and radiologic signs of IA. The etiologic agents were Aspergillus flavus (11 cases) and Aspergillus fumigatus (three cases). The mean time of positivity of PCR-ELISA in the blood before the appearance of clinical signs was 12.6 days. PCR was found to be the earliest indicator of IA preceding nonspecific clinical and radiologic findings. The sensitivity, specificity, positive, and negative predictive values of PCR-ELISA to detect DNA-specific for Aspergillus species in patients with proven and probable IA were 66%, 96%, 62.5%, and 97%, respectively. In case patients were treated with antifungal drugs, and the treatment was successful, fungal PCR assay became negative after 14 days and if the treatment failed, assay was positive until death.We demonstrated, in the present study, the incidence of IA in leukemic patients and the usefulness of molecular assay for early diagnosis and monitoring of the treatment of IA.Specific detection of Aspergillus species in blood and bronchoalveolar lavage samples of immunocompromised patients by two-step PCR.The increasing incidence of aspergillosis, a life-threatening infection in immunocompromised patients, emphasizes the need to improve the currently limited diagnostic tools. We developed a two-step PCR assay that specifically amplifies a region of the 18S rRNA gene that is highly conserved in Aspergillus species. A number of primers with the least homology to equivalent human or Candida gene sequences were screened for the pairs that gave the highest sensitivity and specificity. No cross-reaction with the wide range of fungal and bacterial pathogens so far tested was observed. This assay allows direct and rapid detection of down to 10 fg of Aspergillus DNA corresponding to 1 to 5 CFU per ml of blood. A total of 315 blood and bronchoalveolar lavage samples from 140 subjects, including 93 patients at risk for invasive fungal disease, were screened. The result was a 100% correlation between positive histology, culture, or high-resolution computed tomography findings and PCR results. The test specificity was 89%. Our data point to the considerable potential clinical value of this simple, specific, rapid, and inexpensive PCR assay for improving the means of early diagnosis of systemic aspergillosis in high-risk patients.Prospective screening by a panfungal polymerase chain reaction assay in patients at risk for fungal infections: implications for the management of febrile neutropenia.Invasive fungal infections are a major cause of mortality in neutropenic cancer patients. To determine whether a polymerase chain reaction (PCR)-based assay enabled the identification of patients at risk for invasive fungal infections, a prospective monitoring once per week was performed during 92 neutropenic episodes in patients receiving chemotherapy for acute leukaemia or high-dose therapy followed by allogeneic or autologous stem cell transplantation, with the investigators blinded to clinical and microbiological data. PCR positivity was documented in 34 out of 92 risk episodes. All patients developing proven invasive fungal infection were found PCR positive, and PCR was found to be the earliest indicator of invasive fungal infection preceding clinical evidence by a mean of 5.75 d (range 0-14 d). In febrile neutropenic patients without a prior history of invasive fungal infection, a sensitivity of 100% and a specificity of 73% of the PCR assay for the development of proven or probable invasive fungal infection was documented. In conclusion, panfungal PCR performed prospectively once a week enabled the identification of patients at high risk for invasive fungal infections.Development of a nested qualitative real-time PCR assay to detect Aspergillus species DNA in clinical specimens.We adapted a nested Aspergillus PCR to a nested qualitative real-time format on a Light Cycler system. An evaluation using 134 clinical specimens showed that the real-time PCR assay significantly reduced the time for results to be made available without compromising sensitivity and was less labor-intensive. Its use will aid in the rapid diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis.PCR and other non-culture methods for diagnosis of invasive Candida infections in allogeneic bone marrow and solid organ transplant recipients.In this prospective study 197 serum and 152 urine samples were collected from 40 bone marrow and solid organ transplant recipients with clinically suspected invasive fungal infection before, during and after empirical treatment with lipid formulation of amphotericin B or fluconazole. Serum was analysed by Candida polymerase chain reaction (PCR) and urine by measurement of D/L-arabinitol ratio. One serum from each patient was also tested for concentration of (1-->3)-beta-glucan and two commercial Candida antigens. Invasive fungal infection was diagnosed in four candidosis and one aspergillosis patients (13%). Positive PCR, elevated D/L-arabinitol ratio, (1-->3)-beta-glucan concentration and antigens were detected in nine, 15, 17, and seven patients, respectively. The agreement between PCR and D/L-arabinitol assays was poor. However, 56% agreement was observed between positive PCR and beta-glucan and/or antigen assays, and 60% agreement between positive D/L-arabinitol and beta-glucan and/or antigen assays. Combination of several non-culture assays is needed to diagnose invasive fungal infection in high-risk transplant recipients. No single test was sufficient for diagnosis.[Combination of real-time polymerase chain reaction assay and serum galactomannan in the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in patients with hematological malignancies and recipients of hematopoietic stem cell transplantation].To evaluate the role of real-time polymerase chain reaction (real-time PCR) assay combined with serum galactomannan (GM) detection in the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) with hematological malignancies or hematopoietic stem cell transplantation.Eighty patients were enrolled. PCR and GM were performed simultaneously on 205 serum samples. The agreement between these two assays and the diagnostic value of the combination were analyzed.There were 5 proven IA, 20 probable IA, 34 possible IA and 21 non-IA. Agreement between real-time PCR and GM was 77.5%. When both positive, the positive predictive value could reach 100%; when both negative, the negative predictive value could reach 90.9%.PCR agrees well with GM. When these two assays are combined, invasive aspergillosis can be diagnosed more accurately.Randomized PCR-based therapy and risk factors for invasive fungal infection following reduced-intensity conditioning and hematopoietic SCT.Invasive fungal infections (IFIs) are major complications after allogeneic hematopoietic SCT (HSCT). PCR-based assays able to detect fungal DNA have been reported to precede clinical diagnosis of IFI. We performed a prospective study to evaluate a PCR-based pre-emptive approach. Ninety-nine patients undergoing reduced-intensity conditioning (RIC) HSCT were followed with fungal PCR during the first 100 days post transplantation. Patients who tested positive were randomized to receive liposomal amphotericin B, or to no intervention. After day 100, PCR tests were performed only on clinical suspicion of IFI. A single positive PCR test was not associated with IFI, irrespective of treatment. After day 100, PCR tests for Aspergillus did not contribute to diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA). The cumulative incidence rates of proven or probable IA during the first year after transplantation were 9%. GVHD grades II-IV (P=0.0014), CMV-seronegative recipient with CMV-seropositive donor (P0.001), and conditioning with alemtuzumab (P=0.014) were significant risk factors for developing IA in a multivariate model. In this study, PCR on peripheral blood was a poor indicator of IFI early after RIC HSCT. Aspergillus PCR tests performed on clinical suspicion after day 100 were insufficiently sensitive to be diagnostically useful.Development of a serum-based Taqman real-time PCR assay for diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis.We compared an Aspergillus fumigatus-specific Taqman real-time PCR assay for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) with the enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay Platelia Aspergillus method. Patients with proven or probable IA had positive results with at least one of the two methods. The PCR method seems to be more specific, and a combination of the two should improve the diagnosis of IA.The prospective evaluation of a nested polymerase chain reaction assay for the early detection of Aspergillus infection in patients with leukaemia or undergoing allograft treatment.Patients with acute leukaemia or undergoing allogenic bone marrow transplantation at University College London Hospital Trust were screened for the presence of aspergillosis by polymerase chain reaction (PCR). Aspergillus DNA, from whole blood samples, was amplified by nested PCR to detect a 135 bp fragment in the mitochondrial region of Aspergillus fumigatus or A. flavus (121 bp). One colony-forming unit (CFU) per 2 ml of blood or 1-10 fg DNA could be detected. Patients at risk of aspergillosis were classified as probable or possible based on the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer definitions. Antifungal drugs given were recorded. In four of 17 patients studied, infection was not suspected and the PCR was negative. Four patients were considered to have possible aspergillosis infection and were PCR positive on at least one occasion. Of the three patients in the probable group, four of the nine samples tested PCR positive from one patient and in another patient only one of nine samples tested positive. The remaining six patients were not suspected of having fungal infection but each had one or two PCR-positive results. In summary, six of seven patients thought to have clinical evidence of infection were PCR positive on at least one occasion and treatment with antifungals may have reduced infection below detectable levels.A MIQE-compliant real-time PCR assay for Aspergillus detection.The polymerase chain reaction (PCR) is widely used as a diagnostic tool in clinical laboratories and is particularly effective for detecting and identifying infectious agents for which routine culture and microscopy methods are inadequate. Invasive fungal disease (IFD) is a major cause of morbidity and mortality in immunosuppressed patients, and optimal diagnostic criteria are contentious. Although PCR-based methods have long been used for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA), variable performance in clinical practice has limited their value. This shortcoming is a consequence of differing sample selection, collection and preparation protocols coupled with a lack of standardisation of the PCR itself. Furthermore, it has become clear that the performance of PCR-based assays in general is compromised by the inadequacy of experimental controls, insufficient optimisation of assay performance as well as lack of transparency in reporting experimental details. The recently published "Minimum Information for the publication of real-time Quantitative PCR Experiments" (MIQE) guidelines provide a blueprint for good PCR assay design and unambiguous reporting of experimental detail and results. We report the first real-time quantitative PCR (qPCR) assay targeting Aspergillus species that has been designed, optimised and validated in strict compliance with the MIQE guidelines. The hydrolysis probe-based assay, designed to target the 18S rRNA DNA sequence of Aspergillus species, has an efficiency of 100% (range 95-107%), a dynamic range of at least six orders of magnitude and limits of quantification and detection of 6 and 0.6 Aspergillus fumigatus genomes, respectively. It does not amplify Candida, Scedosporium, Fusarium or Rhizopus species and its clinical sensitivity is demonstrated in histological material from proven IA cases, as well as concordant PCR and galactomannan data in matched broncho-alveolar lavage and blood samples. The robustness, specificity and sensitivity of this assay make it an ideal molecular diagnostic tool for clinical use.Galactomannan and PCR versus culture and histology for directing use of antifungal treatment for invasive aspergillosis in high-risk haematology patients: a randomised controlled trial.Empirical treatment with antifungal drugs is often used in haematology patients at high risk of invasive aspergillosis. We compared a standard diagnostic strategy (culture and histology) with a rapid biomarker-based diagnostic strategy (aspergillus galactomannan and PCR) for directing the use of antifungal treatment in this group of patients.In this open-label, parallel-group, randomised controlled trial, eligible patients were adults undergoing allogeneic stem-cell transplantation or chemotherapy for acute leukaemia, with no history of invasive fungal disease. Enrolled patients were randomly assigned (1:1) by a computer-generated schedule to follow either a standard diagnostic strategy (based on culture and histology) or a biomarker-based diagnostic strategy (aspergillus galactomannan and PCR) to direct treatment with antifungal drugs. Patients, were followed up for 26 weeks or until death. Masking of the use of different diagnostic tests was not possible for patients, treating physicians, or investigators. The primary endpoint was empirical treatment with antifungal drugs in the 26 weeks after enrolment (for the biomarker-based diagnostic strategy, a single postive galactomannan or PCR result was deemed insufficient to confirm invasive aspergillosis, so treatment in this context was classified as empirical). This outcome was assessed by an independent data review committee from which the study allocations were masked. Analyses were by intention to treat and included all enrolled patients. This study is registered with ClinicalTrial.gov, number NCT00163722.240 eligible patients were recruited from six Australian centres between Sept 30, 2005, and Nov 19, 2009. 122 were assigned the standard diagnostic strategy and 118 the biomarker-based diagnostic strategy. 39 patients (32%) in the standard diagnosis group and 18 (15%) in the biomarker diagnosis group received empirical antifungal treatment (difference 17%, 95% CI 4-26; p=0·002). The numbers of patients who had hepatotoxic and nephrotoxic effects did not differ significantly between the standard diagnosis and biomarker diagnosis groups (hepatotoxic effects: 21 [17%] vs 12 [10%], p=0·11; nephrotoxic effects: 52 [43%] vs 60 [51%], p=0·20).Use of aspergillus galactomannan and PCR to direct treatment reduced use of empirical antifungal treatment. This approach is an effective strategy for the management of invasive aspergillosis in high-risk haematology patients.Australian National Health and Medical Research Council, Cancer Council New South Wales, Pfizer, Merck, Gilead Sciences.Diagnostic value of PCR analysis of bacteria and fungi from blood in empiric-therapy-resistant febrile neutropenia.This study aimed to assess the clinical utility of PCR for the analysis of bacteria and fungi from blood for the management of febrile neutropenic patients with hematologic malignancies. Using a PCR system able to detect a broad range of bacteria and fungi, we conducted a prospective pilot study of periodic analyses of blood from patients following intensive chemotherapy. When fever occurred, it was treated with empirical antibiotic therapy, basically without knowledge of the PCR results. In 23 febrile episodes during the neutropenic period, bacteria were detected by PCR in 11 cases, while the same species were identified by blood culture in 3 cases. In 10 out of 11 PCR-positive cases, fever could be managed by empirical therapy. In the empirical-therapy-resistant case, the identification of Stenotrophomonas maltophilia by PCR led to improvement of fever. No fungi were detected by PCR in febrile cases, while Aspergillus fumigatus was detected in one afebrile patient, several days before a clinical diagnosis was made. In subsequent sporadic PCR analyses in 15 cases of febrile neutropenia, bacteria were detected by both PCR and blood culture in 7 cases and by PCR alone in 6. Fungi were not detected. While fever was improved by empirical therapy in 12 out of the 13 PCR-positive cases, the identification of Pseudomonas aeruginosa by PCR in one therapy-resistant case contributed to the successful treatment of persistent fever. Our results indicate that PCR analysis of bacteria from blood provides essential information for managing empirical-therapy-resistant febrile neutropenia.Detection of Aspergillus DNA by a nested PCR assay is able to improve the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in paediatric patients.Fungal infections are a leading cause of morbidity and mortality in severely immunocompromised patients and have been increasing in incidence in recent years. Invasive aspergillosis (IA) is the most common filamentous fungal infection and is, in adults as well as in children, difficult to diagnose. Several PCR assays to detect Aspergillus DNA have been established, but so far, studies on molecular tools for the diagnosis of IA in children are few. We evaluated the results of a nested PCR assay to detect Aspergillus DNA in clinical samples from paediatric and adolescent patients with suspected IA. Blood and non-blood samples from immunocompromised paediatric and adolescent patients with suspected invasive fungal infection were sent for processing Aspergillus PCR to our laboratory. PCR results from consecutive patients from three university children's hospitals investigated between November 2000 and January 2007 were evaluated. Fungal infections were classified according to the EORTC classification on the grounds of clinical findings, microbiology and radio-imaging results. Two hundred and ninety-one samples from 71 patients were investigated for the presence of Aspergillus DNA by our previously described nested PCR assay. Two, 3 and 34 patients had proven, probable and possible IA, respectively. Sensitivity (calculated from proven and probable patients, n=5) and specificity (calculated from patients without IA, n=32) rates of the PCR assay were 80 and 81 %, respectively. Our nested PCR assay was able to detect Aspergillus DNA in blood, cerebrospinal fluid and bronchoalveolar lavage samples from paediatric and adolescent patients with IA with high sensitivity and specificity rates.Aspergillus PCR testing: results from a prospective PCR study within the AmBiLoad trial.Invasive fungal infection (IFI) is a major cause of morbidity and mortality in severely immunocompromised patients and is difficult to diagnose. The significance of molecular methods for diagnosis of IFI is still controversial. In a subset of patients treated within the AmBiLoad Trial, samples were investigated prospectively by a nested Aspergillus PCR assay to re-evaluate the significance of PCR in this setting.In the randomized, prospective multicenter AmBiLoad trial, patients with proven or probable IFI were randomized to receive liposomal amphotericin B (L-AMB) 3 or 10 mg/kg QD for 14 d followed by L-AMB 3 mg/kg QD. From 91 patients, 459 serial samples (98% blood samples) were investigated by a nested PCR assay for Aspergillus DNA. All samples were investigated in our laboratory with a previously described nested and a quantitative PCR assay. As required by the study protocol, serial Aspergillus antigen galactomannan was performed. IFI was defined according to modified EORTC/MSG 2002 criteria as applied in the AmBiLoad trial.Seven and 52 patients had proven and probable IFI according to modified EORTC/MSG criteria, respectively. The median number of samples investigated per patient was 4. Seventy percent of samples were obtained during treatment with antifungal study medication. Forty-three samples gave positive PCR results. Patients with an unfavorable outcome had a significantly higher rate of positive PCR results (48% versus 21%).The sensitivity of Aspergillus PCR testing is limited during antifungal therapy. The tendency for persistently positive PCR results to indicate a poor prognosis has to be confirmed in further studies.Study on invasive fungal infections in immunocompromised patients to present a suitable early diagnostic procedure.The incidence of invasive fungal infections has increased considerably in recent years. The aim of this study was to present a suitable early diagnostic procedure in immunocompromised patients, using a molecular assay.From September 2005 to January 2007, 310 immunosuppressed patients were followed for fungal infections for a 6-month period. EDTA-anticoagulant whole blood specimens were collected prospectively once per week and stored at -20 degrees C until use in molecular assays.Molecular assays were positive in 55 (17.7%) patients. The etiologic agents were Candida albicans (67.3%), Aspergillus flavus (20.0%), Aspergillus fumigatus (7.3%), Candida tropicalis (3.6%), and Candida krusei (1.8%). The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of PCR-ELISA with proven and probable invasive fungal infections were 84.6%, 92.7%, 75.3%, and 95.8%, respectively. The results showed that the mean clinical manifestation time was 38.96 days and the mean time of positivity of the molecular test (time of infection) was 17.69 days. A linear model for predicted infection and clinical manifestation time was found to be as follows: Y=11.64+1.147X, r(2)=0.812, where Y is the time at presentation of clinical signs and X is the time of infection (positive PCR-ELISA result).It may be concluded that the molecular assay would help in the diagnosis of invasive fungal infections at the early stage of infection, before clinical manifestations.Comparison of serum galactomannan antigen detection and competitive polymerase chain reaction for diagnosing invasive aspergillosis.To improve the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA), we retrospectively compared competitive polymerase chain reaction (PCR) and sandwich ELISA for detection of serum galactomannan (GM) antigen. We studied 281 serum samples collected weekly during the period at risk for IA from 41 selected hematology patients. Twenty-two patients had confirmed, probable, or suspected IA, according to clinical and mycologic data. Fifteen of them had positive GM titers (87 samples) and 12 had positive PCRs (20 samples). Nineteen of the 20 PCR-positive samples were also GM-positive. Of the 19 patients without IA (83 samples), one had 3 GM-false-positive samples. Neither test anticipated the initiation of antifungal therapy on the basis of clinical suspicion. Both tests were more likely to be positive before death. This study suggests that PCR on serum samples is not more sensitive than GM detection. However, PCR can improve the specificity of the GM test. Together, these noninvasive tests should improve the diagnosis of IA.Molecular detection and identification of Candida and Aspergillus spp. from clinical samples using real-time PCR.This report describes the development of a real-time LightCycler assay for the detection and identification of Candida and Aspergillus spp., using the MagNa Pure LC Instrument for automated extraction of fungal DNA. The assay takes 5-6 h to perform. The oligonucleotide primers and probes used for species identification were derived from the DNA sequences of the 18S rRNA genes of various fungal pathogens. All samples were screened for Aspergillus and Candida to the genus level in the real-time PCR assay. If a sample was Candida-positive, typing to species level was performed using five species-specific probes. The assay detected and identified most of the clinically relevant Aspergillus and Candida spp. with a sensitivity of 2 CFU/mL blood. Amplification was 100% specific for all Aspergillus and Candida spp. tested. To assess clinical applicability, 1,650 consecutive samples (1,330 blood samples, 295 samples from other body fluids and 25 biopsy samples) from patients with suspected invasive fungal infections were analysed. In total, 114 (6.9%) samples were PCR-positive, 5.3% for Candida and 1.7% for Aspergillus spp. In patients with positive PCR results for Candida and Aspergillus, verification with conventional methods was possible in 83% and 50% of cases, respectively. In conclusion, the real-time PCR assay allows sensitive and specific detection and identification of fungal pathogens in vitro and in vivo.Comparison of PCR-ELISA and galactomannan detection for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis.To compare PCR with galactomannan antigen detection for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA).We prospectively collected serial blood samples from haematological patients at risk of IA, and analysed their samples retrospectively for galactomannan (GM) antigen using the Platelia test and for aspergillus DNA using an in-house PCR-ELISA assay. Matched GM and PCR analyses were performed on 263 samples from 25 patients. Patients were classified for potential IA according to international consensus criteria, with five patients classified as positive (four proven, one probable) and 20 classified as negative (seven possible, 13 no evidence IA).All five patients with IA were positive by PCR with positive results in 24 of 82 samples, whereas three of five patients were positive by GM with four of 82 samples being positive. Three of 20 patients without IA were positive by PCR in 18 of 181 samples, whereas corresponding results for GM detection were one of 20 and one of 181, respectively. Adjustment of ELISA cut-off values and/or the requirement for two consecutive samples to be positive generated different results; however, lowering the positivity index (PI) for GM detection to 0.5 did not improve the sensitivity of the assay. Optimal results for PCR detection and GM were: 100% and 60% sensitivity, 85% and 95% specificity, 0.625 and 0.75 positive predictive value, and 1.0 and 0.8 negative predictive value, with a false-positive sample rate of 8 and 0.4%, positive likelihood ratio of 6.66 and 11.99 and negative likelihood ratio of 0 and 0.42, respectively.This PCR method is very sensitive for the diagnosis of IA but is associated with a moderate rate of false positives; the GM assay exhibited poor sensitivity but high specificity. Further evaluation of PCR assays for the diagnosis of IA and other invasive fungal infections is warranted.Clinical impact of enhanced diagnosis of invasive fungal disease in high-risk haematology and stem cell transplant patients.To investigate the impact of routine use of biomarkers for diagnosing fungal infection within a care pathway on antifungal usage and clinical outcomes.A cohort of high-risk haematology and stem cell transplant patients was entered into a neutropenic care pathway in which targeted diagnostic testing replaced empiric antifungal treatment. Patients were screened twice a week by PCR and antigen testing during fever or when chronic graft versus host disease was present and were followed-up for a minimum of 1 year.No excess morbidity or mortality was seen in patients in whom empiric antifungal treatment was withheld, and there were substantial savings in antifungal drug expenditure.The introduction of a comprehensive diagnostic surveillance strategy to exclude invasive fungal infection in high-risk patients with haematological malignancy and those undergoing transplantation can result in improvements in clinical management. There are also potential additional benefits of improved patient survival, decreased morbidity and decreased hospital stay.Use of real-time PCR on blood samples for diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis.We developed a new quantitative system for diagnosis of invasive pulmonary aspergillosis (IPA) using real-time automated polymerase chain reaction (PCR). Intra-assay and interassay precision rates for in vitro examination were 2.53% and 2.20%, respectively, and the linearity of this assay was obtained when there were >20 copies/well. We examined 323 samples taken from 122 patients with hematological malignancies, including 33 patients with IPA and 89 control patients. Blood samples were subjected to PCR antigen detection methods, using enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) and determination of plasma (1-->3)-beta-D-glucan (BDG) concentration. The sensitivities of PCR, ELISA, and BDG measurement for diagnosis of IPA were 79%, 58%, and 67%, respectively; the specificities were 92%, 97%, and 84%. Positive findings on PCR preceded those of computed tomography by -0.3+/-6.6 days, those of BDG measurement by 6.5+/-4.9 days, and those of ELISA by 2.8+/-4.1 days. Real-time PCR was sensitive for IPA diagnosis, and quantitation was accurate.The evolution and evaluation of a whole blood polymerase chain reaction assay for the detection of invasive aspergillosis in hematology patients in a routine clinical setting.Invasive aspergillosis (IA) is associated with high mortality. Successful outcome with treatment is linked to early diagnosis. The utility of classic diagnostic methods, however, is limited.To aid in the diagnosis of IA, we retrospectively assessed our diagnostic service, using real-time polymerase chain reaction (PCR) and galactomannan sandwich enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA).A total of 203 patients at risk of invasive fungal infection were screened by PCR, and 116 of the patients were also tested by ELISA. The patient group comprised 176 patients with hematological malignancy and 28 control patients with evidence of invasive candidal infection. Consensus European Organisation for Research and Treatment of Cancer and Mycoses Study Group criteria were used to classify fungal infection, which, by definition, excluded the PCR result. The PCR method was sensitive (up to 92.3% sensitivity) and specific (up to 94.6% specificity) and had good agreement with the galactomannan ELISA (76.7%) and high-resolution computed tomography scan results.A negative PCR result can be used to rule out IA and to limit the need for empirical antifungal therapy; thus, it has a role in diagnosing IA infections, especially in combination with antigen testing. PCR-positive cases classified as "false positives" regularly reflect the limitations of classic microbiological procedures or restricted use of consensus clinical methods employed to classify infection.Ribosomal and mitochondrial DNA target for real-time PCR diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis.The aim of the present study was to assess the diagnostic efficacy of a combination of two quantitative Aspergillus PCR assays, targeting a mitochondrial and a ribosomal target, in patients with risk factors for invasive aspergillosis (IA) and positive galactomannan (GM) antigen. Forty-four patients with hematological malignancies and risk factors for IA according to revised European Organization for Research on Treatment of Cancer and the Mycoses Study Group criteria (EORTC/MSG) criteria and presenting at least two sequential GM-positive sera were included in the study. Mitochondrial PCR was carried out prospectively on all GM-positive serum samples. Ribosomal PCR was carried out retrospectively on frozen stored sera. The sensitivities of mitochondrial and ribosomal PCRs were 58% and 50%, respectively. The diagnostic test performance was improved by using a combination of both PCR assays and by considering a patient PCR positive when at least two positive results were obtained. The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative likelihood ratios were 65%, 94%, and 11.8 and 0.37, respectively. A significant association between fatal outcome at 90 days and positive results of ribosomal PCR assays was observed (adjusted hazard ratio = 8.2; 95% confidence interval [CI] = 1.0 to 65.8; P = 0.048). Our results showed that the combination of two PCR assays targeting mitochondrial and ribosomal Aspergillus DNA improves the sensitivity of PCR in the diagnosis of IA in hematological patients with risk factors and positive GM results. This study also confirms that a positive PCR result is associated with a poor prognosis in these patients and should lead to specific antifungal therapy being introduced immediately.[Detection of Aspergillus infection in blood of malignant hematopoietic tumor patients by two-step polymerase chain reaction].To investigate the sensitivity and specificity of two-step PCR in detection of Aspergillus species in blood from malignant hematopoietic tumor patients.Forty-one blood samples from high-risk patients were detected with two-step PCR. The clinical applicability was assessed with analyzing computed tomography, Aspergillus culture, neutropenia and outcome after anti-fungal therapy.Specific band of PCR was obtained from Aspergillus strains and products of PCR had a high homogeneous in sequence with Aspergillus species. Sixteen of 41 patients were PCR positive and controls were all PCR negative. Among PCR positive patients, 4 patients had positive cultures. The lowest WBC count was (0.30 +/- 0.14) x 10(9)/L and (0.50 +/- 0.26) x 10(9)/L respectively and duration with WBC count less than 1.0 x 10(9)/L was (19.00 +/- 8.31) days and (12.69 +/- 6.95) days respectively in the two groups. After antifungal therapy, one of the patients with PCR positive died of chemotherapy-related early death.The two-step PCR assay allows for highly sensitive and specific detection of Aspergillus pathogens in vitro and in vivo. The detection with PCR has some value in the early diagnosis and helps us to make decision for antifungal therapy.Molecular detection and identification of Aspergillus spp. from clinical samples using real-time PCR.The definite and rapid diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis is necessary because of the high mortality caused. The objective of this study was to evaluate a real-time PCR assay to detect Aspergillus spp. in clinical samples, based on the Light Cycler technology. Specificity was assessed by using DNA extracted from pathogenic and non-pathogenic bacteria/fungi from Spanish Collection including: two Aspergillus flavus, four Aspergillus fumigatus, two Aspergillus nidulans, two Aspergillus niger and two Aspergillus terreus isolates. The analytical sensitivity was evaluated with different inocula (10(1)-10(5) conidia ml(-1)), and serially diluted DNA of A. fumigatus. To assess clinical applicability, samples from patients at risk were analysed. Species identification was determined by analysing the melting curves. Reactions using genomic DNA from other species of different genera than Aspergillus were negative (specificity: 100%). Analytical sensitivity was 60 fg using DNA and 5-20 conidia using conidial suspensions. The linear range was from 60 to 6 x 10(7) fg. The Tm ranged from 67.34 to 70.7 degrees C for the different Aspergillus spp. studied. Nine hundred and forty-eight consecutive blood samples from 127 patients were processed. In total, 10 (1%) of 948 samples from blood samples were PCR-positive. The real-time PCR assay provides a high sensitivity and specificity for detection of fungal DNA and rapidly identifies most of clinically relevant Aspergillus species.Combined real-time PCR and galactomannan surveillance improves diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in high risk patients with haematological malignancies.Invasive aspergillosis (IA) is a leading complication of intensive treatment for haematological malignancies. Earlier diagnosis should facilitate effective antifungal therapy and prevent progression to invasive disease, which is often lethal. Polymerase chain reaction (PCR) assays, targeting the 28S and ITS ribosomal gene regions respectively, were evaluated for early detection of Aspergillus DNA and for diagnostic utility in patients receiving treatment in two busy haematopoietic stem cell transplant centres. Patients undergoing intensive chemotherapy, autologous or allogeneic transplant were eligible for inclusion in the study. EDTA blood and serum samples for circulating Aspergillus biomarkers, including galactomannan (GM), were collected twice-weekly on a prospective basis from all study patients who were categorized according to international consensus criteria for defining invasive fungal disease (IFD). Of 278 patients recruited there were 44 probable IA cases and only one proven case. Moderate sensitivity and specificity, poor positive predictive value (50-80%), but good negative predictive value (>80-90%) were common to both PCR assays. Overall biomarker performance could be improved by combining positive results of either PCR assay with GM taken within a 12-d period. The addition of PCR to GM monitoring in high-risk patients with haematological malignancies provides greater diagnostic accuracy in invasive aspergillosis.PCR-ELISA for the early diagnosis of invasive pulmonary aspergillus infection in neutropenic patients.To evaluate a newly developed aspergillus mitochondrial gene PCR-ELISA assay for the early diagnosis of invasive pulmonary aspergillosis (IPA) in neutropenic patients.The aspergillus mitochondrial gene was chosen for the amplification target for use with a solution hybridisation assay with colorimetric end stage detection in microtitre plate format (PCR-ELISA). The study group comprised neutropenic patients undergoing febrile episodes not responding to standard antibacterial antibiotics. Patients underwent computed tomography and bronchoscopy. Bronchoalveolar lavage (BAL) fluids were examined by culture and PCR.The aspergillus mitochondrial gene PCR-ELISA was both sensitive (100%) and specific (100%) for IPA in neutropenic patients. All 12 patients with definite or probable IPA had PCR positive BAL fluids. None of the patients with undiagnosed or confirmed infections of other aetiologies were mitochondrial PCR positive. Speciation based upon amplicon size difference was possible.Aspergillus mitochondrial DNA PCR-ELISA on BAL fluid is useful in the early diagnosis of IPA in neutropenic patients alone or, potentially, as an indication for thoracic computed tomography.Assessment of the lightcycler PCR assay for diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in paediatric patients with onco-haematological diseases.A reliable diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) is hampered by the difficulty in obtaining suitable tissue samples. To evaluate the sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value (PPV) and negative predictive value (NPV) of the LightCycler PCR for the diagnosis of IA, 536 blood samples were collected over a 22-month period from 62 paediatric patients (median age 10 years, range 1-18) considered at risk of IA. The galactomannan antigen (GM) and fungal DNA were assessed on serial blood samples. IA was diagnosed in eight of 62 patients (13%): proven, five, probable, three. Sensitivity, specificity, PPV and NPV of LightCycler PCR varied according to the number of positive samples used to define positivity: 88%; 37%; 17% and 95% for single sample positivity; and 63%, 81%, 33% and 94% for serial sample positivity respectively. The concordance between positivity of LightCycler PCR assay and the diagnosis of IA was 79%. The single positivity of LightCycler PCR assay showed a good sensitivity for the diagnosis of IA in paediatric patients. The high NPV makes LightCycler PCR a promising tool in addition to GM testing to design a strategy of pre-emptive antifungal therapy, although further validation studies are needed.